don't say that 
Producer also in the house.. Lets show some love .. #zanjeer 
Team #zanjeer .. Ram Charan in the house. Welcome to bollywood  
u r my rock star forever 
all ok? 
don't feel low 
not at all 
u r my rock star! Always! 
Craving..for familiarity..just something that's real.. 
What do u all think? RT Say hello to #PCErase by feat.  
True :) RT Destiny is not by chance but by choice!Choose the right things fr yourself:) 
My daddy strongest... Sometimes I just want a magic wand.. 
 home cooked meal! Nice! Thanx 
No only if u c it that way..u have to go thru ur process..our actions make us what we r..depend only on urself..and smile! :) 
I love it RT Pic: Jhilmil fan art by Hayley  
the cat n the fiddle..the cow jumped over the moon 
 reminds me of my fav nursery rhyme.O look at the moon..it's shining up thr..O mother..it looks like a lamp in the air.. 
Yay! RT OMFG!!! Just got the news. Guess whaaaaaaat? P!!!! #InMyCity will be the theme song of our graduation ball. Aaaaaah! 
Trueeee! RT "Better to light a candle than to curse the darkness" trueeeeee yeah?? :) 
Come soon Sri!!! Waiting! 
December 
u too samrat! New PC rock star! Welcome! 
u r my new rock star!! Welcome to the family! 
coming soon 
Gn world.. "Even with all the mayonnaise in the world.. U can't make chicken salad out of chicken sh#t!" 
hope 
thx Amrit wil b careful 
thx Riz! Ure the best 
done!! 
happy bday Zaids Didi 
hahah I'm officially Mr Bachchans brand ambassador now!! Thx Milka!! Miss the magnificents tho! 
thx partner! Miss our games tho!! 
In Hydrabad for Zanjeer.. Starting a new film always makes me nervous..hope all in mumbai are safe..RIP Bala saheb. 
True RT "@CancerAreUs: If a #Cancer feels unwanted they'll withdraw without explanation.." :) 
thx MANISH sir! 
thank I sambit 
lotsa love 
Something about meeting friends with no agenda that is so therapeutic! Also Last day of shoot for Krrish3! So excited about the film! 
niiice! 
never upset him 
I'm in mumbai 
barfi 
for sure 
understanding myself 
ugh!!! No way!! Ashtray breath! 
find him for me! 
thank by so much! 
yeesh! Neither 
vocal lessons 
tell them I will be 
haha funny 
doin the Krrish 3 photoshoot 
yes and it's smazing 
dunno yet but I'm sure 
tiger 
when someone sweeps me off my feet 
someday 
thx purva 
no 
19th #erase 
paris 
at the moment revenge 
laaaaate nights 
heeey! 
ya at night!!!! Sheesh!! 
I do 
thank u 
when I meet u! Haha! 
both movies n music 
hahahaha! 
what a rocking song!!! 
leaving for hyd..will miss it! 
I love the lyrics 
19th 
spring 
they were awesome 
wudt know 
good luck 
hardly sleep 
my mother 
she is my absolute fav.. Have u ever her Meena kumar I sing her own poetry? had sent me.. Amazing.. 
Hola world..thank u for liking the teaser of Erase..now quick q n a... 
Erase it all!! For everyone who has had a broken heart! Sneak peek -  featuring 
Happppppyyy bdayyyyy ! Miss u!! 
We went in hard !!but it was worth it!! Love u sister.. 
As everyone comes together to Celebrate Yashji tonight..I sit far away and thank him for touching all our lives..wishing JTHJ huge success. 
Happy bday!!! 
Happy Diwali to everyone..wish I was with my family today..may God bless all of u with purity peace and happiness.here's to true beginnings 
Some of u guys r awesome.it's wonderful that u feel my heart and what is in my mind..thanx for being so kind n havin my back..U know who u r 
Ok same qs..heading off..Leaving u with a thought.. Don't give anything more credit that it deserves..ull always be let down.seek the truth! 
next spring 
my bed 
He has to be honest.. 
I'm out of the country. Will miss it.. 
Quick q n a.. Gotta be a studio! 
 
Happy bday babe 
Happy bday Ankita 
Book stores make me happy. Can spend the whole day just feeling like a bookworm..the smell of the pages r as familiar as ur BFF.. 
Miss u ma  
Eventually in time.. what is true shows its colors.. Harsh truth.. R you ready for it.. That's all u have to ask urself..true is scary.. 
Moms just know what's in ur heart..her one day trip to LA to gimme a hug makes up for so much..just to be held..mommy godi..missed you Ma 
End of a long and fruitful day .. Thank u  
I leave 13th!! Come earlier Bhaiya !!!!! 
nice!! Thx 
nice! 
ya me too 
Didn't know who to share it with so tellin y'all.. Heard in my city on the radio in america...very cool! 
Confidence.. to stand up for who he is..very rare RT what's the first thing you see in a man 
I'm human 
Liars RT what's something you can't tolerate at all?? 
Ok gotta go.. C you soon 
Absolutely RT Do you believe that, "If somebody loves you, s/he will find time for you" 
at work 
every time 
Courage of conviction RT Are there any words of wisdom you’d like to pass along to me? 
Not strted yet!! RT Why arent u singing in live shows in India like you are doing it in US? 
didn't have the courage 
love her 
on my iPad. Very high score 
nachos 
Soon inshallah RT will you be performing at any of the awards shows in hollywood? I wanna see you at the AMA's 
thank u 
In LA RT where r u ryt now...? 
No title for the album yet.. RT do you have a title for your new record? 
Q n a???? 
Just posted a photo  
Happy bday 
I've never had any discussions for the part of Mary Kom..As much as it wud be a great part for any actress to play its speculation for now. 
 nice 
True dat RT "Love without action is meaningless and action without love is irrelevant." - Deepak Chopra 
Gn world.. Gonna give my subconscious a chance!!! Give it to me!!! All u nightmares.. I'm ready for u!! 
Lack of sleep or scared of nightmares... Can't make up my mind..  
To be continued.. tom! RT Me and priyankachopra!!!Smash on the radio!!!Hello India !!!  
u look so pretty in this pic!! 
Sounds soooo craaaaayy! im shocked! RT is going in on this Bomb by me and !!! 
thx babe! I will 
Looking forward.. Downstairs.. Headin up!! Lets goooo! 
Jetlaaaaaaaag!  
Studio bound... Killer song comin up!! California dreamin......  
True RT People often over look the simple answer, thinking that only a complicated solution will solve their problem. 
Back in business with !! What we doin today!! Gimme heeeeerrrr!! 
Fly me away... Anywhere...everywhere.. somewhere..  
Off to LA LA land.... Ciao world... Lets goooooo! 
aye dile beqaraar 
Pehla nasha.. Pehla khumaar.. Naya pyaar hai... Naya Intezaar.. What a song..., 
My future producer being the mommy at a friends baby shower!! Bwaahahahah!  
glad to. U tweeting!! 
I endorse blenders pride fashion tour!! TOUR being operative! 
Ok questions becoming the same!! Gotta go! Flying to LA tonight and got some major packing to do! I'm off! C u guys later 
love 
failure 
blue black 
xoxo 
power 
pretty 
love cycling 
he's sweet! It's cool 
the ring 
DnG the one 
murders 
selfish people 
I have 3!! 
2 days 
lipstick 
I believe 
love 
betrayal 
incomprehensible 
maths 
maths 
gotta find a guy 
my teddy like ted the movie 
coffeeee 
Shoutout to Bareilly 
terrofied 
my phone 
love 
vanilla 
not sure yet 
Had some serious nightmares last night...lets change the mood!! Ok time for a quick Q n A..Lets keep the questions interesting guys!Lets go 
So true!! RT That might sound boring,but I think the boring stuff is the stuff I remember the most.–Russell (Up) 
Shit!! RT the worst is over .. Rescue and recovery now ... Couple of weeks till normality resumes ... 
I studied in New York.. I have family thr.. It feels like my other home is wrecked!! Hope for everyone's safety!! 
I called! Lights etc r out!! 
I hope all is well in NYC! Have my family thr!! God!! Any news guys? What's the situation? 
Ok so flt cancelled to NYC!! Aaaarrrggghh!!!! I'm so mad!!! 
Just saying.. u r typing in eng!! hahhaha! RT if u r n indian then why do u speak in english leave it to americans! 
Too fun! RT Exclusive Feature ::  :: Priyanka Chopra shows Filmfare how to whip up a storm in a day :: 
This cant b real!RT "Can't believe sharks are swimming the streets/yard of NYC #Sandy  u rnt goin der.. 
On my way to infinity2 malad.. C u thr! 
I Wanna sleep in my dreamssss! Gn world! RT height of lazyness!! Sleeping in ur dreamz!!! LoL 
Cine: My brother checkin out the vino!!  #cinemagraph #gif 
that was a RT hon! Someone else said that! 
Ok guys seriously... The world is one!! Lets spread the love not hate!! Now.. Whose up for some jokes! Send me ur best... 
Racist! how bad!! RT Why should an Indian care about Urdu poetry ? Leave that to the Pakis ! 
Supposed to fly to NYC Tom!! Sandy needs to leave!!!! Hope Alls well thr! B careful ! 
soon 
Brothers day out!!!  
ure awesome 
Under the weather!!! Atchoooo!love my new electric blanket and book!! Thx BFF!! U spoil me!! 
Hahahahha RT now you'll be ruling every dream.. nd, now U have official 'takiya-kalaam'!!!!:-) 
that's hardly me 
Thx ITC for my Priyanka cushion!  
Actions.. RT Talk is cheap, but actions are priceless. 
Nothing in the world can't be solved over butter paneer and parathas.. Yum! 
Thx guys RT Pics: Priyanka at People's Choice Awards India love  
Thx for coming when I called u . With my award.. Love u  
My first debut award for my music!! Hahah! Feels nice to be a debutant again..thank u people for making me ur choice! 
Eid Mubarak to all.. May Allah miya grant u all ur wishes and look out for u.. 
Bengaluru bound.. C u guys soon.. 
Had a great time being DJ PeeCee in buzz,hard rock,7degrees and striker..Thank u for showing me great party!Delhi u were ragers!!! 
Just finished DJing at striker gurgaon delhi!! Too much fun! Thank u all!!Now off to 7 degrees!! Lets do this!!! 
In delhi for my first DJ stint!! C u tonight... In ur city.... 
To everyone celebrating Eid today..Eid Mubarak.. May this year be filled with love peace and prosperity 
Met the amazing Abida Parvin! I'm such a huge fan..maahi yaar di gharoli.. Aandhi chali toh.. So may great S  
Just heard about mr Jaspal Bhattis sad demise.. God...flop show was my fav show!! Jeez! RIP sir! My condolences to the grieving family. 
Delhi bound..with a heavy heart for many reasons.. Running away.. Work beckons.. C u tonight! In ur city! 
Writing cause I have an upheaval in my heart..was doing a Barfi act for People's choice awards but since yashjis (cont)  
Off to party in Delhi tonight at Buzz,& HRC DLF Place,Saket tom and 7 Brauhus and Striker in Gurgaon.Lets c if u catch me play DJ! #inmycity 
Gn world.. With love happiness n dreams in my eyes I say goodnight.... Sweet dreams and PS I love u 
Hahahahahaha!! RT What’s on the ‘cards' for PC?  
hahah! C u in ur city soon divs 
On itunes RT how are you? when can we buy your album, and can we buy it in germany too? wish u all the best, love you ;) 
good idea!! Be Psy!! 
Love it thk u RT u r in my locket. stop scrolling. and have a look piyu  
Wow thx RT my goddesss......today is day where i complted watch barfi 100 times!!!bubyee yaar!! 
Luv repeatsRT Dogtag:Gucci Aviators:Chanel Hightops:Aldo #itscooltorepeat Jeans:RagnBone waistcoat:Zara  
Here's wishing lots of luck for ajab gajab love! Show some support guys!!! 
I'm coming to ur city,starting with Delhi! party at Buzz,& HRC DLF Place,Saket tom and 7 Brauhus and Striker in Gurgaon. Catch me if u can! 
Want 2 see me make an entire club dance to"In My City"?Follow & be a part of the BPFT's Pub Crawl! Delhi -25th, Bangalore -26th. 
Aap sabko dussehra ki shubkamnain.. Heres to joyous New beginnings for all.. 
Don't wanna wake up!!!!!  
just be u Bhaiya!! Funny AND original... !!! Bwaaahaha!! Bwaaahaha!! 
Guys seriously!!! Crew means my people ya!!! My friends..my dosts.... 
Ma crew...love y'all and  
Uff my heart hurts RT Amul's farewell to Yash Chopra   
Nice!! n true!!RT What Makes #Cancer Hot: Their Loyalty 
Cine: Heading to shoot..love greens in mumbai  #cinemagraph #gif 
Twinkle twinke lil stars! Love sleeping under them. Now to wake up!!  
Thank u  
I didn't even work with him..never really spent too much time either..but whatever lil I did..his hearty laugh (cont)  
love 
Will NOT be coming to celebrate My Music Single Infiniti Mall, Malad (W) today at 3.00 pm !My apologies but celebrations are not in order 
my prayers... God bless 
Will NOT be coming to celebrate My Music Single Infiniti Mall, Malad (W) today at 3.00 pm !My apologies but celebrations are not in order. 
Also a very happy bday to my sister ! May God give u happiness and success always... Love u baby 
Ab Mohabbat ka Bhi dil toot Gaya... RIP Yashji.. Thank u for always being so kind to me..thank u for showing us what love should be.. 
What is this life.....thoughts are all we have!!  
The best view in the world... The ocean and its waves just feel like home..  
Agreed RT 'The most desired gift of love is not diamonds or roses or chocolate. It is focused attention.' agree ?? 
Love this pic! Thk u for sending it! and  
Thank u for 3 million guys!!! U r the best!muuuuaaaah! 
Lets hear u!! thx babe RT Seriously I'm gonna scream if you read this letter ~  
I luuv it RT PLZZZ PC HAVE A LOOK!I DREW THIS PIC OF U!Tell me how it is!Love u from France muahhh<3  
thx jazzy! I'm super 
Nice!!! RT Talk is cheap. if you like me, tell me. if you miss me. show me. if you love me, prove it.. 
Hahaha!! so true RT : When #Cancers cry about one thing, they end up crying about everything that's messed up in their life. 
Thx malini! 
pls thank ur nani from me and say my pranam to her 
Facts do not cease to exist because they r ignored!! Well said! 
Happy belated bday to my BFF!!! on 17th!! Show her some love guys!! 
Thank u Shri Tirupati balaji maharaj for a magical Darshan.Blessed to b in ur presence..happy navratri to every1!May mata rani bless us all 
Ok I'm out.. Thx for trying. Still crabby! C u soon 
my dad 
very 
buhfffiii 
yes I am 
yes 
I'm glad 
liked it v much 
DnG the one 
his smell his smile and integrity 
good luck babe 
love 
Roma jhilmil Meghna Priya suzanna 
I'm not invited but I wish her lots of positivity and happiness 
very soon 
merc 
I think it was insane 
almost over 
someone who is sensitive to me 
jerry McGuire 
think alia varun and sid have a super future here! 
22 hahha 
nokia 
In a crabby mood! Q n a to make me feel better? Shoot... 
Unconditional love! Missed u Brando..  
Haha!! cute RT a very interesting interview of by author sidin vadukut! :)  
they not home 
Finally homeward bound! Feel like I haven't been home in years!! Yay! My room! Filled with welcome memories!my bro! Yay! Ps I love u! 
Thank u for an insane night and happy bday !! Will miss u babe!  
 Interesting spin ! What say? 
My cuuuutest nephew! Introducing suryansh!  
thank u so much 
Hard night??  
Thank u busan for such a wonderful reception for #barfi! only heard K-pop n Psy in the car! Off to delhi now!Finally India bound..missed u.. 
So glad u r here ! Missed u and ur warm hugs! 
All my energies at the #barfi screening at the Busan Film Festival!Thank u everyone for making our very special film such a big success! 
Happy bday !!Missed the party of the decade sir but here's wishing you many many years of health and happiness..Love and regards 
Sorry to cut this off!But felt announced..busan!Gyan for the day...when u r let down by pple..reach within urself and smile for what u have! 
I hope I can live up 
to keep all my loved ones healthy 
I love ills 
a few weeks.. It's in edit now 
hey u 
sometimes 
fall madly in love 
changed me as a person 
soon as the right guy asks 
nov 
thank u 
next year summerish 
love the music of JTHJ 
would love to 
scary 
hi 
sorry not this time 
don 2 
black 
new delhi 
not as of now.. Only transit 
ure right!! Hahah! Had wrong info! Formerly called Pusan now busan! Jeez! 
Feel like a q n a while in the lounge.. Ask away.. 
Ans busan is now apparently called Pusan... 
So clearly is a fake account! Sorry guys! Also typo! My iPad spell checks on its own! I meant epitome!! 
Thanx darling ...I'm ur greatest fan! Thank u for ur kind words... 
Korea bound..Pusan film festival screens Barfi!!Totally excited..Just not for the 15 hr flight!Cudve bought a plane with my air miles by now 
Korea bound..Pusan film festival screens Barfi!!Totally excited..Just not for the 15 hr flight!Cudve bought a plane with my air miles by now 
Happy Bday Rekha ma'am! U r an epitope of beauty n grace.. Thank u for ur kindness n love always.... 
Ok world! While some people in the world stay up ... some go to bed! Peace and tranquility to u all... Xoxo 
thank u shak!! 
Chk it...  
Chilled with the girls after sooo long.  n !!! Lost track of my exhaustion! 
Say whaaaaa?  
Ok! I'm out guys!! Crew telling me its time to take off! C u soon Jakarta! My first time so hope it'll be fun! Xoxo 
 
I don't reply to spammers.. So thank u for respecting that.. Hugs!! 
thank u 
not always! 
I quoted Will smith! 
true! 
death before sleeping in public! Haha! 
Being realistic is the most commonly travelled road to mediocrity. What's the point of being realistic?its (cont)  
Jakarta bound!Hate this midnight flight..no sleep n no stayin up!n to top it..Missed my connection2!aargh!What to do at the airport now!???! 
I'd like to be less emotional 
honesty is the best way to impress a girl 
wud love to 
happy bday Rashmi 
nice 
hope I live up 
I work Sundays too 
u bet!! 
I would! Thus us just a start 
thank u 
still have that cheque! Didn't cash it 
u were a hater?!!!! 
true 
I guess 
Mumbai bound for just a few hrs!Feel like I have wheels on my feet or wings on my back!Haha!the clouds r my friends and my dreams r my life! 
Haha!RT I don't understand..if haters hate u so much then why they follow u nd whn u reply them y they show it to thr frnds? 
I wanna sing like the birds sing.. Not worrying about who hears or what they think... Rumi 
India bound! Lost what time zone I'm in  
Daddy Mommie n beti!! Will miss u so much!  
Will miss u family! and Sana apa! Farewells at the airport  
Midnight snack!! Yummy!  
Sibling love!! n I!! Love u Priyam pampoo! Midnight run to Denny's!  
My Mommie in the pink in med school! So purdy!!  
Mrs Akhouri!! Maaaami! Love u!  
Cleopatra!!! familia time!  
Don't party so hard Leela maasi! The other Dr in the house!  
This is my uncle Dr. Akhouri  and chk this video out..his residents at his hosp made it!Too funny!  
u always end up goin to the beach when I'm not around!! Grrrrr 
thx ayushman 
Repeating my latest fav ysl tote! No time to change the bag actually! #itscooltorepeat  
Totally RT@stylebyami Let's start a campaign #itscooltorepeat On celebrities repeating clothes n accessories are you with me?@priyankachopra 
thx shaaaang 
there is on iPad 
Sleeeeeep is here! Rochester bound! Can't wait to c my parents!  
Who loves spotify?!! Check it out!  
Thank u guys!!!!! 
Yaaaay! RT Ranbir , Priyanka’s Barfi! Has Crossed 100 Cr Mark !!  
OMG!!!! First video done!! After 22 hrs of shoot! Well done team PC! now let's do this!!! Thank u all! Need my zzzzzzs 
Just got a brand new #Lumia 900 on my video shoot set of #inmycity. Thanks!  
Last change for the video!!! At bloody 4 am!!! Ugh!! Anyway!! Been so fun! Gotta finish dolling up! C ya later! 
I loooove that song! My all time fav! 
awww. Thx u guys! 
glad u noticed ;) sneak peak! 
Thank u Joseph! RT BREAKING NEWS: Joseph Gordon-Levitt aka ROBIN loves In My City!  
not at all 
hey 
Jeez! u must really hate the world! RT i wonder who will marry a plastic woman. You wil die out of lonelines 
Please stop everything at once n watch this finely nuanced piece of acting.Think you'll appreciate the subtlety. Enjoy. 
Done!!!! RT extra energy= a bowl of cherries, a Pepsi and yelling out: "Nothing can stop me!" 
Ok guys I'm out!! Gotta rehearse before getting into glam! Phew!! Ciao!! Spread the love! Xoxo ! 
dying to have biryani 
gori means a white girl 
buuuuh-fiiii 
agreed 
Is this a hate tweet? RT It's like only responds to hate tweets. 
Sad that anythin global means gori to u.the world is our oyster!open ur eyes and ur mind RT@ItzZubi stop tryin to be a gori.Stick 2bollywood 
Off to day 2 of video shoot! Dayum ! Ur choreography killing me! 3 changes today!Aaaarrgh!What do u guys do for extra energy? 
Check it out!  
Soooo tired I can't feel my feet!All nighters seem to be in Vogue for me! Need some serious zzzzzs soon so i can fit into my heels!Gn world! 
it was awesome! 
thank u! U guys were awesome!! 
aww! Thank u! U guys killed it today! 
Haha!!!!! 
Haha!!!! RT you need to get a boyfriend 
miss yuuuuuuu! 
Day 1- Video-#inmycity Time for a costume change!! Phew!! And Now the dancing starts!! And I'm fading..... Coffeeeeee! 
Happy bday Dash!!!! 
DONE! 
Glam squad in da house! Eric Ferrell and ! Lets goooo!  
Nice!! RT you know its BIG when you're Norwegian friends are listening to #inmycity ! #loveloveLOVE it!! ❤❤❤ 
Lets show the world what thumkas r made of!! Doin it desi style!!! 
1st day of the official video shoot for #inmycity!!Eeep!Feel like a debutant!Don't remember the last time I was THIS nervous!! Scaaary! 
Haha!!!! U give naaaaa!!! 
Hehe!! Yay! Thx partner! 
Thank u babe!!! 
Thx so much ritz!!! Yay! 
Thank u pc maniacs and everyone 4 supporting!Barfi is a success only cause of u!Now can't wait to c #inmycity in top 10 inshallah!It's all U 
BTW looooovw challa !! Tooooooo adorable! Love the army gear! Kill it!!!!! 
Thank uRT as soon as i opened the itunes store..the first thing that showed up was 'Priyanka Chopra' WOW you go girl!!xoxo 
Thank u soooo much babe! 
Yay! RT on top 100 without being available to india through itunes! Now we are talking about some real stuff!! :D 
#82 already! my pc rock stars killing it!  
thaaaanx kunal!!!! 
yaay! 
what does that mean? 
Thx Farhan!!! Yaaaay!! 
Very funny!! U were the first to make me sing! Chalo done! Aapke liye 25% discount!Hahahaha! Thank u ! Too exciting 
Thank u RT my brother is autistic,ppl ashamed to have a brother with that i m proud that films are made for kids like him 
#barfi crosses 100cr #inmycity is in top 100 charts on itunes in one night! Aaaaaargh! Too excited! 
What a day! Thank u god! Now off to bed! Shoot Tom of the video of #inmycity with ! Lets goooo! homepage!  
On US iTunes homepage today! Yay!  
What a feeling! RT REVEAL: In My City  is now.available on iTunes! 
 
2 exciting! thk u all RT Making it to the home page on iTunes..@priyankachopra's #InMyCity - Get it now!  
OMG!!! its here!!! RT Making it to the home page on iTunes... #InMyCity - Get it now!  
Back to LA n off to fittings n rehearsal!! Video shoot Tom!! God! Need this cold to go!! Atchoooo ! 
LA bound! Ugh! Think I'm sick!!! Noooo! Not before my video shoot!! Thk god for boots at london airport! Need all the vitamins I can get!! 
Indiaaaaaa!!!!! India!!!! Go go go!!! 
Ganpati bappa!Moreya!RT Deva shree ganesha deva all over country for Anand pujan #devotional song for Ganesha from agneepath 
thaaaank u soooo much babe! Yay! Ur wishes r always the sweetest! 
Haha! My secrets out!RT oh my. Now we know why you sport such big shades most of the time. Lol!!! 
Zzzzz behind those shades!!  
Jodhpur bound on 2 hrs of sleep!!Have a show to do tonight thatI haven't even rehearsed yet!But the show will go on..n I'll sleep when I die 
Good luck babe!Its awesome!Say whaa?RT@deespeak Sharing the trailer of my FIRST BENGALI FILM with you all  #PaanchAdhyay 
Thank u soooo much maam. RT Priyanka chopra's single is vibrant and should soon be on everyones lips. Congratulations dear one 
awwwww!!! 
hahaha! As soon as I'm back!!! 
Shooting the nokia lumia diwali commercial!! Jet lag kickin in now!!!!!!  
Say whaaa? Pick ur teams!! RT Priyanka's NFL looks!  
Mumbai bound!Brain freeze just transiting thru london!Brrr!next few days are nuts...Keep up!Looking forward to the familiarity #inmycity 😍 
Haha! RT Wow no wonder you don't seem to age!Between all the time difference in your constant travelling you balance time out 
Sometimes u can't say everything..make sure u feel it tho..they'll feel it!!! Ps I love u... Sweeeeeet! 
Back to mumbai for a day...then back to LA to shoot my video! Yikes! After all those rehearsals etc now it feels like its happening!!! 
Haha! RT Boys are like bathrooms, either taken or full of shit. 
dont be afraid to stand up for what u deserve..and if u don't get it..it never was urs..but ull never know till u take that chance..xoxo 
Good night world. Hold onto ur dreams.. Seldom they come true...but when they do...it's worth it all! Xoxo 
Thk uRT loved ur interview in TOI 2day I really likd d quote "I jst want 2 b gr8"..I'm a big admirer f ur guts 2speak ur mind.. 
thx babe 
I love bubbles! RT u remind me of Bubbles the PowerPuff Girl(: Totes Adorbs!! IDK if u know her(:<33 
Done RT #Goodnight sleeping with the thought that will notice me and #Retweet Me :) 
Haha! RT I hate you but i like ur films 
Styled by my lil sis.. !! Say whaaa?  
LMAO RT n tomatoes gonna tomate..lol:-). 
hi 
thx avish 
N potatoes gonna potate!!! RT haters are gonna hate. 
done! 
Just cause some1 appreciates good music doesnt make u less desi man!RT PC is tweeting Maroon 5 lyrics,tryin to act all not-desi 
Maroon 5 
If Happy Ever After did exist,I would still be holdin u like this.All those fairy tales are full of shit,1 more stupid luv song,I'll be sick 
Its amazing how perspective changes.What seems like so imp at 1 point seems so insignificant at others..small!a kid's perspective is so pure 
Yay! RT 'In My City' Rocks!  
Team PC lunch!!! Fun! Needed it!  
happpppy bday BRO!!! Hahha!! Ragin' tonight!!!!! 
Congrats to u too team! RT Hat-trick! hat-trick! hat-trick! Way to go -  
me me!!! Wassssssup partner?! 
Verrrryyy happppyyy RT firstly #DON2...then #Agneepath and now #Barfi! 100 crore hattrick! :D you..must be very happy , no? 
Need to wake up!grrr!woke up pissed off!!Hate that pple just don't c things for what they r!Glam squad on its way so here goes!Up and away! 
Thank u all!! Sweet! RT Priyanka Chopra voted Bollywood’s biggest heroine!  via 
Thk u RT please if you ever see this tweet.Know that there's a girl that is always dying to gt noticed  
Rehearsing away!!! n !! Need a break!!!  
Always had the accent!!! Dayum!! Haha! Thx for sending RT 
#youtube Miss World 2000 - Crowning Moment  
2nd Weekend Worldwide Box Office Collections Of BARFI!  Total Worldwide Collections till Now : 93.90 Crores ! :) 
Thk u 
thank u ma'am! Pls do when u can.... 
Shoutout!my faaav!@SrideviBKapoor !!! Let's show this lovely lady some twitter madness!!"u understand? U better understand"love u Sri ma'am! 
Haha!! Thk u ken! RT Can't believe it is the same girl who plays Jhilmil in Barfi and the hottie in the Blenders Pride commercial 
Ok ok gn! 
6 months before Miss World..one month before Miss India  
Alright guys!!! Gn! Morning rehearsals!!!Believe in ur dreams.. Wake up and make them come true..Love is all u need.Don't worry be Buuuh-fi! 
Thk u so muchRT Priyanka, I have a son with autism. Just finished seeing Barfi n u brought tears of joy to my eyes. Kudos to u! 
Haha! RT Your haters aftr gttng a RT frm u must be jumping around ..saying pc replied pc replied..lmao 
Haha! RT you are d first celeb which retweets insults sent to her as well :-) 
Thk u RT #Barfi No1 in my movies to watch list Creating unforgettable characters..jungli billi and jhilmil I here!take a bow 
Chillin like a villain!!!!  
Love it pc rockstar!RT "@xamtxlovesxyoux: Keep calm and maybe take a look at this?  
Aww sweeet!! RT my car has your name on it!!
  
hahahhahahahahah!! C u Tom at rehearsal! Let's show the team how it's done!!! 
yaaaay! Text me when they land! 
U can't force ur opinions or the way u think on pple..Always good to accept tht everyone is different..Easier that way!Don't worry b Barfi 
let's do this desi style!! Choreographer in the house!!!! Killin me !!lets show some love!! 
Off to work!Head reeling with excitement!Thank u for the good wishes!praying for the best now..desi girl Jhilmil signing out!Buuuuh-fiiiiii! 
thank u 
thank u 
don't kill u!! 
Wow!sad about life?Dont worry b barfi! RT cos this woman looks soo ugly and retarded.can't sing nor act!kick her outta films pls! 
thank u for the belief 
Thk u sir RT T 876 - 'Barfi' India's entry at the Oscars !! great news ... congratulations all !! 
Sweet thk u RT I made this little vidlet on the behind the scenes video of  :) 
Buuuh- fiiiiii!! 
thxxxxxx mush!!! Yay! 
thx Anshul 
Yay RT Barfi! is india's official entry to Oscars. This is the 4th UTV film in last 7 years to go to the Oscars. 
yaaaaay! 
Sirji!!!!! Sherwani silwa lijiye! yaaay!! Give it up for the Man who made Barfi solely possible!! Take a bow dada! so proud! 
thhhx devansh! 
yaaaay! 
Yaaaaaay!!India's official entry to the Oscars!!!Anurag sir,RK,Ills,ronnie,Sid n all!wish I was in India to share this!Go team! #BarfiOscars 
Phew! That trip was craaaaaay! Back to LA! Back to work Tom! Gn world! Be happy! It's all good! Keep the faith! 
Pink n gwen!! Stage on fire! Love them!  
Too much funRT Catching No Doubt live at #iHeartRadio in Las Vegas. rocks the night away!  
 Vegas bound!! Let's go girls! 
Desi girl signing out!! Ciao all! 
Ok guys!! Gotta go! Thx for the q n a! Wil post pics from Vegas! 
just a lyric video 
Inshallah! RT when will your album songs be on Billboard? 
No. RT Was #InMyCity written by you? 
I trained RT did u learn singing or is it naturally??? 
Totally RT Can we expect some music written by you in your coming singles? 
Totally RT Are you going to have any ballads on your album? :) 
Not yet! Just visiting! U never know! RT r u performing at the iheartradio fest?? 
loooove Bipasha 
Will pass on the msg! RT Please ask Ranbir to marry me. :) Thanks! Also, loved Jhilmil. Too cute! B-) 
Hugggie! RT first one I followed 2 years ago and it seems I'm still invisible!! Can I get a hug PLZZ! If not a hug then scold me 
Thats the plan RT I'm so glad you're making a mark in the music industry! I do hope this will open it up for more of us :) 
Totally RT can i please get the right to call u mimi didi ? please please 
Love that scene RT The cutest moment was when Jhilmil protected Barfi from Shruti in the last scene! #TrueLove :) 
Absolutely RT were You a student of ARMY PUBLIC SCHOOL?? :) 
Loved the trailer! Cant wait for the film! Loved kat and anushka RT What you think about Jab Tak Hai Jaan trailer? 
Achtung baby! (spelling :( )RT Pls tell me a word in german. :) Love you 
Ans 1 never! Ans 2 haha RT As a child did you always want to be a movie star?If no, what did you want to be? Also, Marry me? :D 
Fab! RT Ranbir as a co-star..hot or not? 
Thk u RT I realized how many people tweet to you , so deleting my Q . I have to say great turn as jhilmil . Very best to you . 
I just did 
Oct!! RT When can I download your new single from iTunes? 
Not yet but i wish madhur bebo and the team lots of luck! RT have u watched heroine? 
don't have one 
Sometime oct! RT when is #inmycity releasing in the uk iTunes ???????????????????? 
Love n work RT What is your Passion ? 
thx babe! Just have fun! Don't let any one take that away! Life is too short 
17 
I don't respond! I worked very hard and won't let anyone take that away 
wait n watch 
I trained hard 
ure my new rockstar!! Promise no spamming tho!!😉 
keeping it organic 
just happened 
huge hug! 
rajni sir!! 
thank u 
I agree! It's in her blood!! 😉 
thank u imran 
my mom 
yes! I loved it! 
kyon 
Ure definately it! Snaaaap! RT fav ass hole ??? 
thank u for asking..he's much better 
Quick Q n A.. Let's goooo 
Headed to the iHeartRadio festival starting today in Vegas! Shud be super fun! Looking forward to 'no doubt' performing! love gwen! 
bechara.. Attention ke liye Kya Kya Karna padta hai 
u saw it? I missed it!!! 😖@vikramchandra 
Nice!! RT Omg they just played s ft In My City here in my Gym in Germany #fangirlmoment 
Sweet! RT Indian superstar has arrived in the US (via 
Saw the book of Mormon the other day on broadway.. How wonderful to be a part of stage!!super show! 
I missed it!! RT Just saw promo for #ThursdayNightFootball.....#InMyCity 
Do not chase people.. Be u and do ur own thing and work hard.. The right people who belong in ur life will come to u..and stay..- Wu Tang 
thank u babe 
Chk it!! RT Lyric Video Premiere: #InMyCity

 
Off to rehearsal!!! Let's show the world what bollywoods made of!!! Lets Do this desi style!!! 
Inspired..enchanted swan lake..only stay around the truth  
thx u guys!!!! Now play it!!! Haha!! 
slow n steady 
on iTunes first week of oct! 
Chk it out!! RT NOW PLAYING: #InMyCity feat.  
Burffffffiiii!! Jhilmil! Nanu pls!!!  
Sistah..sistah...  
True!! RT #Cancer's can be the most fun to be around, but when upset...back off!! true huh? 
Shoutout! RT #AlaBarfi ...One Of The Cutest Songs! :D 
kidaaaaaaaan!!! 
Yay! RT BARFI enters IMDB top 500!! 
Love me some fresh orange juice!!!  
Loved waking up to  !Forgot all my jet lag!Now just 40 more countries to go! Haha! Video comin up on iTunes soon! 
Thank u so much everyone RT Guys! is number one on Nokia's music charts!  
Sleeping with my dreams intact! Keep the faith world!! 
just a few weeks., as soon as the video is ready 
Thank u Mr. Bachchan.. Ur kind words mean so much. Love and respect always.. 
Something about today is empty. Gonna get to work! Always the answer! 
thx Anshul :) 
Proud of u team barfi !!!  ,  
Back to LA LA land....jet lag of another order this time!! Phew!! 
thank u so much babe 
goin to shoot official video to LA Tom..so shud be out in a few weeks with the single on iTunes.. Look out for it 
hehehe 
Also thank u for lending me all ur my name is Khan research, u gave me perspective on Jhilmil..owe u another one..love always 
thank u so much dee... So glad u liked! Love u lots 
have2thank anjula acharia-bath,Jimmy Iovine, carter,team@interscope n team atomfactory 
Gotta thank Anurag sir for seeing jhilmil in me..rk ileana 4 being the most amazin coactors!Congrats Team Barfi!So proud to b a part of this 
..and u all made me pass with flying colours.. Now I just hope the film does well and the song charts..hoping for the best! 
Thank u everyone for so much love affection and appreciation for #Barfi and #inmycity !I'm so overwhelmed..this weekend was my toughest exam 
Thank u Karan..so glad u liked the film and my work. .@kjohar25 
Thank u Mr.Khan for your kind words of encouragement..really appreciate it. Regards..PC 
thanx oq 
thank u Taran sir! From team Barfi! 
thank u Taran sir! From team Barfi! 
yay! Thank u 
asha tai Mai to thi hi nahi.. So sorry.. Mai aapko phone karti hoon.. Mickey se number leke.. 
Mai Bilkul theek hoon Asha tai. Aap Kaisi hain.. 
no my official video will 
shows how much u shud believe what u read!😉 
1day to go!!Eeep! #InMyCity n #Barfi!Thx for u support so far guys!I'm most nervous n excited as I've ever been!Only gonna be around +vity! 
hey mahi 
Guys!y'all have wrong impression!NOT performin at the NFL game on thu.the1:30min version of my song wil debut as the theme ths season!on TV! 
thx Tisha 
thank u shourob 
thx Riddhi 
Wow thx RT i think this would make u smile.pls pls have a look at it!my creation for you.please have a look  
thank u 
Tom! Eeeep! 
thank u 
hey Anuj 
Wow! Anger management maybe? Or just plain I'll mannered? RT learn to spell bitch 
sad u see it as a division of the world.. I see it as a failure of humanity 
Off to delhi.. Hate early morning flights..Cruelty!!!! Aaaargh! On 2 hrs of sleep..needed a reason to smile this morning! 
9/11.Taking a moment to remember the day the world felt fear and witnessed a hideous form of hatred.. #wewillneverforget” 
happy bday babe!!!!! 
haaaapy bday rock star 
We must never forget- "Because the best of humanity can overcome the worst hate"  (video via #Honor911 
I think this is One of my best commercials..well done Bharat sikka!RT  Blenders Pride Fashion Tour TVC 
thx Tanuj 
Gn world... Zzzzzz 
3 days to go......  
so truuueeee! Wow! I can't believe it either..😝 
Thank u bangalore!! U were amazing!! 
Faaab! RT The Fatafati(Bengali for awesome)song of the year!With unseen behind the scene visuals from #Barfi  
imagine bhaiya!!!! Eeeeeep! 
For ur eyes only...my single cover! Say whaaaaa?  
Team #Barfi in Bangalore ... Meet us at 4pm at Phoenix Marketcity Mall 
 Only for you guys... a sneak peek! "In My City'... coming soon! Nervous and excited! Say whaaaa? 
And Kolkata it is!! Thank u xaviers college for making team #Barfi xaviarian!! Had toooo much fun! 
Feeling fear right now.... On our way to c first copy of #Barfi! Jeeeeeez! Wish us luck! team #barfi ! 
On our way!! Rain rain! RT@RCityMall Are you joining us to celebrate Barfi! With Ranbir Kapoor n 
Fun that was RT In Rag and bone jeans and pop att Devi necklace.  
So tired today...Functioning on 4 hrs of sleep!! Yeeeesh!! But what the hell.. #DontWorryBeBarfi ... Teehee! Off to work wit s cuppa coffee! 
Racism is in every part of d world..studyin in the US contributed incredibly to my upbringing..unfair 2just say this..  
Haha! So true! RT #Cancer doesn't usually act on impulse, but when they do, they normally regret it. 
happy bday asha tai...seeing ur spunk after all these yrs is exactly what makes u legendary.. Thank u for inspiring the world 
Loved it RT PC ROCKS: in Hot Pink Masaba dress, BCBG blazer from poshfusion  
Super cute! Yay #jhilmil RT cute jhilmil Plz hav a look on ds :))  
congrats babe! U fully deserve it! Song of the year! Woah! 
congrats on the film babe!! Can't wait to c it! 
thx babe.. U too! Nazar mat jagaaaaaa!!! 
Thank u belief has always kept me going  
Will miss being at lala lajpat rai college with Ranbir and Ileana..My 
#Barfi team..Show them some love pls...I'm so sorry for not being thr 
In delhi..for the india today youth summit.. Key note speaker..Shud be on at about 630..c u guys at siri fort auditorium..looking forward 
I likeyRT Zara shirt,J brands,jimmy choos and aquamarine.#PCSTYLE Tie d end of your shirt as a double knot  
Experiences r like the waves,
They come to u on d shore of life,drag d sand from beneath ur feet,but each wave makes u stand on a new base. 
I love it! RT i really really hope you see this! My creation for you :) pls see it  
So proud ma!RT@TeamPriyanka RT my Mommy dearest gives expert Skin tips Contestants  
7 days to go...for My single 'in my city' and my special film 'Barfi' Jeeeez! Scared...excited... nervous.. 
thx Anubhav! 
thx vishal... 
Wow! Its time...  
Agreed! RT" Not bcoz I'm a part of the film but don't u think BARFI album is just outstanding !!!! 
Kyon - Barfi Official HD New Full Song  #Barfi  
thx Riz! 
Gn....zzzz..  
While the worlds asleep..to be awake and feel the angels..is magical. Gn world. 
Have u guys checked out this super fun YouTube app that has created for Barfi!  - make Barfi do ur bidding! 
cause I believe in all u do! 
Tel me what you guys think....Kyon - Barfi Official HD New Full Song  #Barfi 
The 'desi' and his 'girl' with shooting Nikon!  
Life is such a circle...Like I said.. Seems like yest..  
Seems like yest..just 17! Thank u for sending this.. RT  chopra miss world 2000 😍☺ 
Thk u RT Feel like am flying in a heaven listening to #barfi soundtrack...one of the best in recent times! 
Was great to c u babe! U were incredible on the show!RT At the shoot with these two beautiful women :)  
Mumbai bound...yay! Home sweet home!! 
Early mornin #yummyinmytummy  
Muah matt! Nat says haaaya! 
Cupcake mania...especially for me! You guys always find a way to make me feel so special! #yummyinmytummy  
Thank you everyone at Arabian Centre Mall Dubai for the warm welcome for barfi! U mAke is believe in fairy tales!  
Music Review : Barfi! BARFI is a delightful musical journey Don't miss it,Go Grab It!!!
Rating - 4.5/5  
huge Shoutout to my stylist ! Responsible for most of what I wear! Love u babe! 
Love coming to dubai!! Such a fun place! Super press conference! C u at Arabian centre tonight at 8ish 
Its ridiculous how the media just makes up stories and pple have opinions about it!there is no sch statement I made!!!  
Yup my necklace does say Shubh labh.. Good luck.  
Say whaaaaa!  
Finished interviews in london.. Now dubai bound!!  
Yay! Music Review: 'Barfi!' soundtrack is simple, flawless - Apun Ka Choice  
Mornin London City!!!!  
On my way to ur city..london!Should b thr in a few!Super stoked about sharing #Barfi with all of u!For now..I need me my zzzzs!luv long flts 
Love it RT and here it is can't imagine I got one. LOOK !please RT!!or reply...wud make my day..!! :')  
London bound! So excited about promoting Barfi.. The film and my single comes the same time And such different vibes to both! Very grateful! 
Haha RT Hi Boyfriend. i think it is the time you should start to exist. 
pop 
been in LA babe!! Finishing up.. Thank u! Can't wait for u to hear either 
thaaaank u lala paaji!! Muah! Love u mostest! 
Happppppy Bday ure a dear friend and a wonderful filmmaker..jalwa sirji!!!!! Good luck with Heroine! 
Also a day to remember the incredible late Mother Teresa.A lady who taught us how selfless love can be..just gave..never expected.happy bday 
Thank u AK Hangal Ji for all the cinematic memories... This year has been a huge loss for us.. My condolences to the family. RIP 
Words are just breaths that disappear into the wind..someone wise said"actions speak louder than words"don't just say..it means nothing..do! 
Right on RT “Be with a guy who ruins your lipstick. Not your mascara.” :))) right..??.. :))) 
real 
The sound of fire... Mmmmm endless  
Muah RT@TISH93333: We are already so so proud! and this is a little proof pls watch it  xxx” pls watch<3 
thx tanuj 
gotcha 
it's just a single.. A few singles then Album next year.. 
don't be like that mehdi.. Everyone has a right to their opinion.. Just be happy whr u are! Big hug! 
Just heard . RIP Neil Armstrong.. U made us believe in endless possibilities..in reaching for the stars..in achieving.... My Condolences. 
Thank u india!Hope I make yall proud.Come with me on this RT@TeamPriyanka Thursday nights will never be the same again!  
Haha! True RT #Cancer = Moody bitch 
Last day of shoot! Yaaaay! So excited soooooo exhausted!! MJ on the radio n heading to work!!! Let's kick start this day!!! 
haha!! Knotty or naughty!? 
Happy budddddaay to my buddy ! Wish I was there to give her a big hug! Love u loads!! Let's show her some rock star luuuuvve! 
Thank u for the luv RT EXCLUSIVE SONG PROMO: #Aashiyan from #Barfi featuring & Ranbir Kapoor  
good luck !!! The newest debutant around!!!! Love u babe 
absolutely right!! #instantfanfollow 
Thank u :)RT Jhilmil is Powerhouse character ..So Emotional and meaningful..Take a bow you are a Brilliant Actress♥ 
So u wudnt want me flollowing u right?RT No genuine friends will be obtained by these kind of gimmics 
Big hug to my only fan follow!!! Rockstar xoxo Sending a shout out to all my fans in kenya! 
For all those asking.. Me and havin a pyjama party with nail paints!! Funnnnn! 
U guys came up with some very funny answers!! Hahahaha!! Gotta go to bed now!! Night boys n girls!! 
U r right!!! I get a follow! RT easy!! Pic is showing of nail polish.. Right? Lol 
Very close RT three people teasin a friend together 
Thats toooo funny! RT "guess who!?" says the 3 armed lady 
First one to figure out what is this pic about...and that person will get a follow!!! Bring it on  
My mermaid.. Desi goddess diva nahi.... Divya Jyoti in the house. And our fav lion king mufasa! Yay!  
Loooove having sooo many wardrobe options!!! Teehee!  
Team PC! Makin it happen! Love y'all  
Life is what happens when u r making plans.... 
Thank God for the best dad ever!Ur blessings, resilience gives me the strength to overcome it all!happy bday to the most imp man in my life! 
Finally it's a wrap! Aaah! Looking forward to a good nights sleep!! 
that's rubbish!! 
Missed dancing!!!! Hard core rehearsals r the best work out!!! That too In the LA heat!! Who wuda thot? Def losing kgs! Hahah! 
Barfi! Album on iTunes Now ! :) Download it here --->>  
good luck tish! 
Pic perfect!!! Sibling love  
Hahaha! RT Respect your parents... They grew up without wikipedia and google maps... 
Early morning run in lush bel air!!! I love fresh green neighbourhoods! I'm so not a morning person..but what happened today?!? Teeheehee! 
My condolences!! Too funny! RT Pc Please Pray For My Phone :( I Think This Phone Is Gonna Die ! :/ 
Eid Mubarak to the world.. A day of faith hope love and fun!! May the almighty bless this world with peace! 
rehna padta hai 
Mmmmm...now some zzzzzzz... Gn world  
Happy bday !!! Partner have a good one! 
Eid Mubarak to everyone. Hope this year is filled with prosperity, happiness and celebrations! 
Good luck Abu Jani Sandeep Khosla on India Fantasique...I'm sure it will be amazing..Sorry for not making it tonight... But love &luck!! 
RIP Ashok mehta.. Used to fondly call him chachu.. Indias Pioneer cinematographer..Such fond memories of him. Ur legacy lives on chachu! 
Feel touched by an angel today...! 
Feel touched by an angel today...! 
hey tisha! 
RIP Vilasrao Deshmukhji.. I'm so sorry . My condolences to u and your family. 
Off to shoot for a fabulous commercial for the blenders pride fashion tour..looking forward! 
Fresh homemade OJ!! I dunno what they put in it it's awesuuuum!! Dads recipe!!! Yummmm!  
yay thx vishal !!!! 
Thank u RT please have a lookk...its a gift...:D For Daddy's lil girl...  
Off to work!Last day of Krrish 3 song!!Had so much doing a dhamaal Bollywood dance song after so long(in 5 inch stilletos)lol!such fun.!!!!! 
Congrats!!! RT Here is the film I directed for the couture week that played before my show last night.  
Lights on set...! Beautiful!  
Haha RT you are your daddys lil girl, and i wanna be your lil boy. :] -- 
hi!!! 
haaaapy bday 
I love it! Haha RT Haters gonna hate, potatoes gonna potate like says. :D 
Absolutely RT Life is so much easier with a sense of humor. Agreed? 😄 
haaaaappppy bday Sri!!!! Glad u in mumbai!! Have a fantastic one!! Show my friend some love 
Hahaha! RT Dear 's haters.... This is for you ☺  
Muah  
Early morning giggles! Smile n the world smiles with u.....good morning world  
Who that??????  
Olrite guys!!Krrish calling...gotta go help save the world!Thx for a loving morning..sometimes when there is no explanation depend on faith! 
hahaha 
Get into pples head 
hey 
compromise 
gulab jamun 
wild ones.. Titanium 
shooting for Krrish 3 
yes I do 
my fans r my spine 
says who 
both 
when the right guy asks me 
4 
shoot costumes 
I dont 
night out 
says who 
agreed 
someone once told me "failure is not an option" 
cappuccino 
dunkin dinuts 
hey 
hey 
loooove! 
constant smile rather than momentary laughter 
taco bell all the way 
it's a secret 
adore it 
love ur tweets 
u just dont 
rachel 
second 
blue 
hope 
day dream 
I was too its ok! Join the insomniac club 
5 
4yrs old 
fall in love 
pause till the phase goes! Never react when ur angry 
she's a dear friend 
first single September 
no but the funnest! 
wudnt u wanna know! 
DUnno how to do anything else..started at 17! 
the biryani 
hey 
good luck 
New song promo of #Barfi - Main Kya Karoon  
thank u 
happy bday!!! 
Quick q n a.. Let's go.. 
Love is a consistent passion to give..not a meek persistent hope to receive~lord Krishna .Wish we cud all be like that!happy janmashthmi all 
Hmm..dont like ur dad mych so u?RT We don't all love, with all the tattoos in the world you choose a lame one 
easy to hide 
ure smart!!! 
haha! Funny! 
For all those asking..here's my tattoo! I love it!glad y'all do too!  
Good luck!!!! !so excited for u 
Hope!  
Something in the air today..hope,belief, faith, love..And nothing like waking up feeling light and hopeful! Had such a fun morning with dad! 
and also a super happy bday to the supremely talented and beAutiful Mrs Deshmukh ! Have a super one babe! 
A huge happy bday Shoutout to one of my all time fav actress Kajol! Love the work u have done and can't wait to see more! 
Happy friendship day to all my twitter friends..it's awesome to know I have so many of u,.very blessed! Xoxo! 
C ya soon home!  
Mumbai bound..feel like I've been away so long..didnt mind except i really missed my family..mommy godi comin up! Yay! 
Thx babe!xoxo RT “First photo shoot for the album!Wow!
”Loved hearing a bit of the music! It blew me away!Fans get excited! 
First photo shoot for the album!!! Wow! Wonder what looks well develop.,I'm excited.. 
A few years ago.... Mia familia!  
How cute! RT I guess I tried to do the pose in your DP, lol it went horribly wrong!  
says who?! 
aapko Bhi 
u r! 
Im so overwhelmedRT at last d tattoo for pls hav a look.. guys pls retweet so she sees it..  
I loved it!! Thk u 
Last few days...  
Ure lovely thk u RT 's Article  ♥please Please PC 
Muah!thk u! RT i'm going to sleeeep darling! Hope u read my letter sooon! Mwahh  
 preview of #Barfi! Say whaaaa? 
True!! RT Ppl dissect us superficially n write abt us but do they really observe us... 
yup! LA 
Just posted a photo  
baaabe!! Just cut vocals for both songs!!! They sound aweeeeesome!! 
My sis Divya in da house!! Yay!  
happppy birthday Sanju sir!!! Have a super year!!! 
I mean it's a tough song to sing! Need TLC! heeeelllppp! 
The real deal! Gosh! This is the most diffult song in singin today!  
How I love Malibu!!! Off to studio now!!! Let's do this!  
U guys r too cute! Thk u RT Have you seen your own PC awards By  
Thats fab! Thk u RT you watched the 70 reasons one right? so hopefully you'll like this  
Agreed!RT Sometimes things fall apart..Because other things can fall together!! #mushlessons #therearenoaccidents 
If today was ur last day..and tomorrow was too late.. Say good bye to yesterday ..live each moment like ur last.. Loooove Nickelback! 
Dinner with team PC LA tonight!Thank you for a great journey full of new beginnings..thank you for believing..now it's all a matter of time. 
Missed the opening ceremony...am I studio....so proud! Go India Go!!! What did I miss? 
Thank u to all u wonderful supporters..I'm so touched that u trended"we love Priyanka Chopra" worldwide!didn't know till now! Thank u! Muah 
Smart boy!!! RT haha PC what a reply to the dumb BT front page story. I love it ;) 

.....more plastic?!!!.. :) haha  
Happy birthday have a super duper day! 
me too 
..of u have shown me..So here I am..cautious..but real..love to all who share love..cause thats all I'm here to do..for anyone else..c ya! 
Sorry i disappeared.I was very hurt by a few haters who i seem to expose myself to by tweeting..but then i also realised how much luv most.. 
Hi Everyone.. 
The serenity that comes with music...mmmmhhh..loooove this song!  
A big big haapi happi wali jappi to my fav bday girl!! Miss u Minnie!! Love always! Noone like u!muah! 
Lets do this!RT in the studio with the lovely and the awesome and the homie's 
Late night in the studio!! Uff!! Tired but gotta sing my ass off!! Last few days of vocals!! Inspiration and TLC needed! 
lady genius in the house!! ! Glad u r here!!! Let's do this!! 
Siddharth Chopra woooop woooopp! Happy bday to u.. happy bday to u 
Apni shaql dekh lo.. Sab khoobsoorat lagenge..@shariq1689 
Happy bday to my baby bro!!  love you forever!! U r such a pride!! Love u! 
Take it away  
Let's show em how it's done team RedOne  
Awww! Loving u babe!!! Lets write history ! RT shes My brown eyed girl  
 getting creative with my boys n ! 
Feeling aggressive in the studio!! Lets bring the house down!!!  
thank u SHEKHAR!! Xoxo!! 
Thank u for liking the IIFA Rekha tribute act..all the credit goes to prabhu sir an Rekha ma'am for being such a sport!! 
I dunno how the album will end up,all I hope is that my dad n y'all who have always supported me in all the risks I have taken,r proud of it 
..but to really experience it..is magical.From the melody comin out of nowhere to the words tht just spring up.I'm lucky to have this chance 
Sitting by the pool before studio n thinkingwhat kind of song to make today..it used to fascinate me when dad wud talk about how musics made 
Neon lights..heart beat..spinning..  
The ocean takes it all away with its waves..like cleaning the shore  
And watch out for Rekha ma'am!! She's gonna kill it!!! 
Thx guys!! Lemme know what u think of my IIFA act!! Was too much fun!! Thank u prabhudeva sir!! 
Vocal producer makin it happen  
Making magic!!! ! Miss u dad  
Lunch with the girls!! Pre studio!!  
The label n the management!! Anjula n Natasha  
Thotful.. Off to studio... Work calling..  
Sunny skies..green greens..  
Mom n dad at a picnic last month... Cute  
My daddy strongest!  
Aaaah!! The bliss and silence of a long flight!! hasta pronto espana!!  
And before u all jump.. I mean crap that goes on in life! Hahah!! I love Dubai! C yallll soon! 
Off to dubai to launch a new range for Asmi.From there Spaaaain! I love making my album..takes me to such exotic places..away from the crap! 
is my brother. 
thx bhaiyaaaa! 
thank u Karan 
Team #Barfi! All smiles!!  Ranbir,me and Ileana.. They said thank U to u all for ur support to Barfi! 
Thank u everyone for such an overwhelming response to the #barfi! Trailer! So glad u all r liking #jhilmil in the lil that we have shown!! 
thank u 
thx babe Muah 
Thanx nick!!!! 
thank u Taran 
yay!!! Thx ritz!! 
hahah that's the point 
hahah that's the point 
So!!! Heres The #Barfi! trailer... Phew!!! Lemme know what yall think.. And spot me if u can....  
Was leaving when i saw this..im so touched!! Thank u guys! RT ! "70 reasons to love PC"  
Ok gosta gooooo!! Shoot calling.. Love y'all n leave y'all ! 
did u hurt th? 
I love the promo of Jism 2 .. looks beautiful.. Congrats and good luck to u guys and ur teams! 
thx Aamir!! So nice to c u after so long!!!! 
I'm sorry it's diff to reply to everyone..xoxo 
don't lose hope..sometimes things don't work out because something better is in store for u 
thank u sirjee!!!! Hoping for the best! 
Sometimes no matter how dark the world may look u just have to keep running..somewhere somehow Gods plans always look out for his children! 
Heading to work!  
Launching the #Barfi! Trailer tonight.....butterflies!it'sa very very special film..thank u for making me jhilmil 
Bored Between shots!! Art!  
Lights..........! Camera.......!Action!!!!!!  
Oh by the way...PS : love u! 
All right guys..have to go shoot now! Thk u for ur questions..just remember fight for being the best u can be..giving up is for cowards!xoxo 
I will promote all over 
confidence 
a bit of both 
big hug 
I'm always busy..I hate shopping 
I'm human 
fifty shades of darker 
my daddy 
Thk u 
big hug 
pls do 
very 
DnG the one 
14th sept 
super fun 
just happens 
wud love to 
pple who give up too easy 
ahlan! 
wud love to 
not yet 
Jerry McGuire 
my cousin but as close as real 
when someone sweeps me away 
cowerdice angers me 
me too 
90percent 
most 
absolutely 
neither! I like spicy not sweet.. ;) 
fear of failure 
Shoutout to ur ma 
very long list..let's just say I have very high standards 
DDLJ 
high metabolism 
Ok.. Quick Q n A!! In the mood to answer u guys!! 
It's a cause very close to my heart.seems like nothing we do is enough.the least we can do is lend support.CPAA n well done 
happy bday stay beautiful 
Off to shoot for Dabur again..long day ahead..walking the ramp for cancer patients aid association for tonight too..phew.. 
Workaholic, melancholic and every thing in between.. My madness or reality..it's a thin line..but the choice is ours..woke up strange today. 
I do too! :) 
some pple just don't know their technology.. I use an iPad to tweet 
Haha RT roses are red, violets are blue, i can't rhyme, my name is atif 
Last day of #barfii shoot! Will miss my team so much!!! Ending a film always takes away a piece of u..ESP this..very special character to me 
Hmmm..I guess a lot of u don't understand poetry!! I loooove the rains.. Troublesome in a beautiful bitter sweet way guys!!!! 
Didn't get a chance to wish my twin a super happy bday yest on twitter..but all my love comin ur way babe! 
What the hell is it about the rains..that makes the heart swell..the soul pine..and the eyes desire...this pitter patter is so troublesome! 
Thank u for sending me this pic  
Heading to the launch of watch time india! Shud b fun.. U thr ? 
Mallika bhatt in da house! Make up artist extraordinaire  
happy bday 
not true 
true 
happy bday babe 
huuuuuuge shoutout!!!!! happppppy bday to my fav rocker!!!! 
U r my angel.... What a great song...feeling blessed today..madness yet merry.., miss my daddy 
Nothing comes close to the love that parents give..no matter what happens loving ur parents is the most unconditional love in the world.. 
Another one! Hahahaha!!  
So! in his Jammies!!! Awww!  
Exhausteeeeeed!!!!  
On my way home..thank u Toronto! C u soon!  
lanvin 
Heading to the premiere....  
Landed in toronto! Looking forward to meeting u all tonight! Thank u for the love 
Thank u london.. For all ur love n support..felt incredibly special yesterday..now off to Toronto..looking forward.. #terimerikahaani 
thank u sirjee! Aapko Mubarak on ur award! 
Thank u inshallah RT 1st day 1st show.n crowd is full in cuttack.its a guarantee blockbuster. 
thx rits.. Pls lemme know what u thot! 
thx mushy!!!!! 
thx MANISH hope u like it 
#terimerikahaani out today!! Hope you all enjoy the movie!! Hope it makes u believe in love even more..! Lemme know what u thought 
thank u Taran so glad u liked 
thx babe! Lemme know what u thought 
thx babe!! Can't wait for u to c it! 
I loved it! Thk u 
thank u ! And here's wishing u a super happy bday!!! 
On my way to feltham for the premiere of #terimerikahaani !! Nervous!  
On my way to feltham for the premiere of #terimerikahaani !! Nervous!!  
thank u baby!!!! 
thx babe! 
thank uuuuuu! 
thx babe.. Miss u here 
thank u wish u cud come tonight!! Ur looks made my characters! 
thank u .. Ur wishes mean the world.. Good luck for ur shoot..stay warm in londons cold!! Hope u can catch #terimerikahaani.. 
we shud b the by 730 
Some of u very intuitive!Hehe!love it! Thank u for such a warm response to the film so far.. From me 
Goin to be on BBC Asian network soon,n seeing y'all tonight at the premiere of #terimerikahaani at cine world feltham!let's make some noise! 
Something beautiful about being in london this time..feels magical  
Just saw #terimerikahaani with the cast n crew.it's so fulfilling to c all ur hard work come together!Yay team TMK!Can't wait for u guys 2 c 
C ya bengaluru! Thk u!  
Something about raindrops and trees that is so comforting..beautiful bengaluru  
use my iPad to tweet 
Too earlyyyy  
Bangaluru bound.. C u soon delhi.. #terimerikahaani  
Thank god for brothers.. Thanx for coming Bhai..  
So happy for my newlyweds..@tam04sharma and Lucky special few in the world  
really? 
True RT I believe switching off is a coward act!i would rather face the situations tackle it in a right manner and than move on.. 
If there one trait I wish I had it wud be to be able to disconnect.. How I envy those who can just switch off.. 
absolutely.. Jal bhun ke raakh! 
Happy fathers day Dad,u have set such high standards..that noone can ever match up,thank u for being my best friend!love bein ur lil girl! 
C u guys soon.... RT On the way wid PC to Crown Plaza faridabad...So see u there...  
Miss my high school!! Was such fun!!! Damn!! I was too bad ass for my own good! Hehe! Was watching a high school movie..just remembered.. 
Happy bday to my beautiful mommy!! My greatest strength!  
Team #terimerikahaani will be at Crown Plaza Mall, Faridabad today 5pm (IST) onwards. C u there! 
Thank u for ur love ahemdabad.. Delhi today!!! Let's make it about u n me... #terimerikahaani 
Peeceelicious RT sweeTttttttttttt.... Pici what is your instagram name ? Because I can't find,,I want to follow u :) 
Hey guys.. Shoutout to my childhood friend ! Show her some love... 
Fun times!!! Love my cuties!!!  
Ridhima with my niece n nephew tanishq n amaira... Chooooo chweet  
Morning Ahmedabad.... Looking forward to seeing you guys today at Iskon Mall at 4 pm today. Cant wait.... 
Thank u Indore for being so wonderful... Ahmedabad today.. Can't wait to c u all #terimerikahaani 
thx:) 
Congratulations to my favourite Chiranjeevi sir!! Naach gaana full on in Hydrabad!!! 
Here's wishing a very happy married life to my Zanjeer co actor Ramcharan and his beautiful better half Upasana!wish I cud have been there! 
Heres wishing a very happy belated bday!! Have a super year!! Xoxoxo 
Ranjish Hii Sahii Dil Hii Dukhaane Ke Liye Aa...
aa Phir Se Mujhe Chhod Ke Jaane Ke Liye Aa...
RIP Mehdi Hassan sahib..immortal memories... 
So team #terimerikahaani off to Indore!! How many of u do we see there?? 
Now team #terimerikahaani on our way to oberoi mall in goregaon! C u guys there... 
Just finished hanging with everyone at jai hind college!! Such fun! Was awesome seeing u again prof. Shivdesani !thanx for the memories!!! 
Marine drive!! Beautiful..  
Team #terimerikahaani at MSG in Melbourne  
On my way to Jai Hind college in Mumbai with and so looking forward to it! Hope to see you guys there... 
Catchin up with my buddy Jugal hansraj... Memories!!  
Fow show RT A girls gotta travel in style ! in Melbourne  
Too funny RT Landed in Melbourne escorted by is 1st class travel  
Some serious girl bonding...IIFA 2012  
Too fun guys!! RT Chill out time post iifa! me n Shirin !  
Agreed RT “@ForTheCancers:#cancers get what they want because they're willing to work for it. this is so YOU 
Time to catch up on some zzzzs with a nice read..c u soon Melbourne  
one day 
Trying to stay awake till I board  
Breakfast in the lounge....neeeeeeeed!!!  
Thank u singapore.U were absolutely wonderful!now team #terimerikahaani off to MELBOURNE!with no sleep at all I look forward to the long flt 
Just finished the #terimerikahaani press con..Was fun actually!now headed for stage rehearsal!God I'm so tired!Wrapped super late last night 
Happy bday !! Hope u have a super year girl!!! 
And I'm here!! #terimerikahani  
#TeriMeriKahaani releases on 22nd June 
no today's act is choreographed by shahid. 
Wearing a gown ESP designed by for the 60s vibe.. Will post pics! 
As usual have a huge crunch on time!gettin ready for IIFA rocks!@shahidkapoor n I r performing on jabse mere dil ko uff from #terimerikahani 
In singapore! Thank u to all my rock stars and everyone else who came to give me such a warm welcome! Love singapore! Xoxo #terimerikahani 
IIFA calling..here we go!!  
super happy bday to the incredible !more power to u girl! 
On my way to singapore!!!! IIFA calling!! So looking forward to the flight.. Wanna sleep and meet everyone in singapore super fresh!muah! 
The smell of geeli mitti in the rains is intoxicating.. Mmmm.. In the mood for looooovvvveeee!!! 
Barfii in Darjeeling Ranbir pragati  
Just got introduced to instagram on my iPad..sounds like fun.. My handle is peeceelicious ! C u thr!!! 
My feet... Barfiiiiiii!  
Happy to be here  
I'll be landing at IIFA in singapore on 8th morning!! U thr? 
Hopped in on s set of heroine and hung out with Bebo and my entire fashion team..such fond memories.. 
Now off to the live chat here on youtube  Looking forward to seein u guys with in just a few #terimerikahani 
Just finished shooting jhalak dikla ja with my fav and darsheel safari..too much fun!!Performed on songs from #terimerikahani 
Yay! So fun! RT So pc is doin an act on jhalak dhikla ja #terimerikahani all the three eras ... Lookout pictures up soon 
hey! Ure awesome 
Hey guys.. Pls Do your bit for those affected by #BreastCancer, join 's initiative! This one is special..  
Sorry guys.. #terimerikahaani release 22nd June!!!!! 
Yaaaay! 23rd June! RT Just Finished the final mix of Teri Meri Kahaani ... Few days more to get the 1st copy .... 
thank u 
hey niki.. Hope ure doing well 
Thank u guys! RT Pic:  The Gorgeous on the cover of Hello! Magazine June 2012 Issue :) 
Ure adorable! What a fun nite tht was...RT Pple can be friends without benefits!  
 - promised a picture... So here it is... Me and my cousin Barbie at the Dabur shoot 
thank u for ur letter! It means a lot 
thank u dipesh! U were in my first 100! 
u never know 
all ok? 
 my fav new pillow!! My bro got for me!Off for day two of Dabur!have to admit its been fun!Too much to do too lil time! 
Now shooting for Dabur!! Phew been a long day.. And just getting longer! But excited to shoot with another cousin Barbie! Will post pics! 
hey and ure awesome! 
There r things known and there r things unknown and in between r the doors: Morrison 
Heading to shoot Barfee and then IIFA rehearsals..prabhudevachoreographing and is killing me!!Man!What an incredible talent!Woke up tired!!! 
 dinner n a movie.. Best n Only way to clear ur head!!! Aaaah! 
yes I am coming for IIFA 
Ok so now back to work... Fun promotions with for #terimerikahaani .. Interviews today.. Straight hair or curly? 
happy bday rock star!!!!! 
Also the super new single "I'm All Yours" feat  ... Yummmmmm 
Thank god for long flights..the silence of the cabin..no one to disturb ur thoughts..nothing to think of..just me n my book..till u land.... 
Off to Mumbai.. Have a looooong few days ahead!! Kicking off #terimerikahaani promotions! Need sleep after this all nighter I just pulled.. 
 graduates in the house!!!! Let's do this... All the way!!!!! 
 breathtaking view from the college!! Wish I could've studied in a place like this!! 
 so proud of u sid!!! 
 my graduate brother!!! Yay! A twelve hour one day trip to Switzerland soooo worth it!! Proud sister!! 
to not ask.. Just get thru to my heart... 
happy bday to my latest twitter rock star!!!! Sorry I wished you late boo!! 
Chk out the trailer for UTV Disney's animated flick,Arjun,looks very exciting.  releases this friday. should be fun 
She is amazing RT #Greenathon ambassador does a hawa hawai with Sridevi. For more pictures, click  
Thank you Farhan... ur support means a lot. Thanks for being here. RT the best to NDTV for the  
thanks for the support RT the greenathon with awareness & have fun while do  
A fun, interesting conversation with & Dr. Roy. Thank u Aamir for adopting 5 villages #Greenathon  
CHOPRA POWER at the NDTV Greenathon 4 -thanks to my lil sis for joining us for this special cause  
We continue 2 raise funds 2 light a billion lives! We've raised Rs.3,09,81,380 for Greenathon 4 - thanks & keep giving  
1,500 km in support of the green cause.Take a bow - a superb effort. it’s also now in the record books!  
the NDTV toyota greenathons here!A whole day of raising awareness for the environment and loads of fun!catch me n live at 9!! 
Back to Mumbai!! Missed the craziness of the city!missed my doggie!missed my Krrish 3 crew!! Back in set! Let's goooo! 
Cant wait!! RT Less than 24 hours to go for the #Greenathon! Pls do spend some time on Sunday collecting plastic waste! 
 
Hey Looking forward to seeing you in 5 days when u enter Mumbai and the Greenathon sets. we'll see u 20th May..keep running! 
that's hysterical 
Gotta get up now!!! Studio!!! Very long day ahead! Come on !! Let's do this!! 
I was a common man!! Remember?! 
Today is the day!! Ishaqzaade! Good luck to my sister and Arjun kapoor !! U guys r gonna flyyyy!I just know!Love u both!!! 
Here it is..humse Pyar Kar Le Tu - Official song - Teri Meri Kahaani (Exclusive):  say whaaaaa?i loves me this song! 
What doesn't kill u makes u stronger... I love the way Kelly clarkson has sung that song!!! 
one of the greatest quotes i ever heard..no brain..no headache...bwaahahahahah! in the studio..trying to make a breakthru..need inspiration! 
Ok guys..itsjust the middle of the day here in LA..long day ahead!! Yikes!! 
the iPad 
So tired today..been at it every day ... Uff! Need sow serious coffee!!yawning is not good at work!!! 
u just did! Big hug 
Return of the zombies! Haha RT Midnight session  
Haha trueRT@MakebaTheBarbie is pulling the greatness out of us@priyankachopra Better yet beating it out of us!#GREATNESSat any cost 
hey hey..here's Wishing my girl a super happy bday! Let's show some desi love! 
Chk out n show some love..hes geniusRT “@Hungama_com: Listen now to #Saazni, the Marathi single by -  
Aww!my own ice cream RT U MUST B SURPRISED!its a story about a crazy pc fan n his priyanka ICE CREAM!  pls RT 
that is beautiful thank u 
Hahaha! Nice RT "Be nice to nerds. Chances are you'll end up working for one." 
Me and my Nokia Lumia... here's why I love it!   
no problem babe! Sorry about the crap seats!! Last min!! 
Super! Thank u.. u guys! RT FACT: Teri Meri Kahaani promo has crossed 1Million Views on Youtube 
here it is u guys..#mukhtassar #terimerikahaani  say whaaaaa 
just come na bhaiyaaaa 
I LUV 'Mukhtasar' from #TeriMeriKahaani & am so glad I can now share it with U'll-listen quick & tell me what u think  
I've been waiting for this one RT ARRIVED! The much awaited MUKHTASAR song promo from #TeriMeriKahaani -  
can't wait for u to come to LA next week!!! yaaaay! 
bored yet nuts??? 
Lets make some magic! RT Writing with the insanely beautiful and life is good!  
happy bday ...have a fantastic year..and remember trust beyond belief is faith.. So keep the faith.. Show some love tweeple! 
Studio bound with !!! Let's do this!! Feelin the blues today..miss mi familia!! :( 
 new poster #TeriMeriKahaani 
LA bound..looking forward to staying in one place for a while..feel like I haven't sat still even for a moment! Zzzzzz callin 
 ooooof can't stop staring outside my balcony... in da house!!! Missed u bhaiiiyyyaaa.. 
 beautiful Miami sun! Aaaah the life! 
Such fun hangin out with u  c u soon in mumbai! 
 team in da house!!! Last day in studio!!c u boys in LA! Thank u for the magic!! 
thank u 
Thank u so much u guys!! Big shout out!!! 
its beautiful !thank u.. 
Not only but i do love r
Them a lot..RT do u love ur rockstars only? :( 
Morning world..last day in london..will miss my crew!! Off to Miami Tom..but now a press con for #TeriMeriKahaani looking forward :) 
Hey guys! A really talented young singer Armaan Malik has sung an amazing cover to Just the way u r..show some love.  
I looooove the london cold !! And the sun! Sooo nice! Off to studio!!  in da house! Shud be fun! 
hey 
haha!!! U funnnyyyy!! Have a good one in Paris .. C ya soon UD 
Happy happy bday u da best evvvvvaaaaa! 
In London town!!!soo nice to be back in studio!!!!down with the flu tho!!atchoooo! says we're making history!!Say whaaa? 
I say pple need to start doin real journalism than actually makin up things 4 the lack of news!hey at least they were hot!hehe 
On the sets of barfii!! Missed U :-D  
 reached taj... Will keep u posted! 
Coming to UP always reminds me of my childhood! The rickshaws I took to school..the thelas of goodies..the cantt..the heat..haha!nice! 
On our way! Agra calling..@milindrunning n me..  
And if u can't b there catch us live on NDTV at 330pm!!! C u guys there!!! 
I'm off to launch the 4th edition of NDTV Toyota Greenathon in Agra.Join me n 100s of school kids as we try n clean up the Yamuna at 330 pm! 
Aaaah the pleasure of havin chatty dinner with my daddy!!my daddy strongest!! #priceless 
The crowd in Pune was wonderfully receptive!!great time at the Sahara subrato roy stadium opening!!the roar of'ganpati bappa Morea'..thank u 
Hahaha!RT didnt happen in 1910..didnt happen in in 1960..Atleast marry me in 2012!!!!!!!.....plzzzzzzzzz...... 
Driving back home..kinda love long drives..gives me time to catch up on sleep! Haha! My pillow n blankie in tow! Off to Agra Tom morning!! 
New poster of #TeriMeriKahaani  Say whaaaaa 
#TeriMeriKahaani first look poster .. Say whaaaaaa!  
Gosh!! Runnin so late!!thank god for flying private..won't have the entire plane giving me dirty looks!Just my staff!Yeesh!fast maqbool bhai 
thank u tishu!!! So does ishaqzaade
!! Yay!!! I'm soooo excited! May 11th comin up! Watch out world.. for my sista!! 
Gn twitterverse..gonna catch them zzzzzs before my alarm goes off in 3hrs! 
yup we r both performing and yes we r friends! 
yup! 
happy bday!! 
haha! I'll sleep for 3 hrs then head out for the show! Cute u r ankita 
Off to the opening of the Sahara stadium Tom! Have a kick ass lavni act prepped! Totally looking forward to a killer energetic performance! 
yes the earlier one was just for u guys.. #Pcmaniacs all the way!! Officially will launch by 730!! #TeriMeriKahaani 
Wow!! #TeriMeriKahaani trending world wide!! Thanx guys!! Such an overwhelming response!! We're so excited!official launch in a few hrs.. 
Yay! Watch it quick & tell me what u think! RT Here it is... exclusive first look of Teri Meri Kahaani..  
Theatrical trailer launch of"Teri meri kahaani"tonight!Very excited!Good luck team!awesome to c hard work come to life! Blast makin the film 
haha!! For sure! N me urs for all ur floral jumpsuits!!;) 
hehe! Stratergy meet!! Haha 
too much fun doin girl time.. Holdin u to the cupcake ATM in LA.. C u guys soon 
And... while we're waiting for the film to start, try ur hand at the awesome Don 2 Social Mobsters Game on Facebook -  
The Chase continues... The world TV premiere of Don 2 tonight at 9:00 p.m. only on Zee Cinema! Will sneak a peek in between shots! Tune-in!! 
Happy bday! RT its my birthday today! Wishes pls! 
Y not?! :) RT do u hav frnd from Pakistan??? Nooo??? So why not me :D 
Hahaha!!! RT can we get married? I love you! #CelebrityCrush 
Night shoot for Kunal kohlis Teri meri kahaani.. Last day of shoot.. Super fun making this film.. Can't wait for u guys to c first look! 
Thank u. Love ur stuff! RT Lovely in white VB SS12 x vb  
My constant state of being has become exhaustion!Gosh!Too much to do!Body aches!Head aches!Starting shoot now on 3 hrs sleep..again!!coffee! 
RIP..RT "Surrender is faith that the power of love can accomplish anything..even when u cant foresee the outcome"-Deepak Chopra 
That was a fun day RT Priyanka Chopra Caught In Auto :D #bollywood #Paparazzi Picture #priyanka  
I sooooo do!! RT U need a spa day :-) 
hey.. What do u analyse 
Awww then u must!! Sooon! RT Don't Want You To Marry Me. I Just Want To Marry My GF, Who Looks Like You. :) Almost Ditto. :p 
Hahha RT you haven't found Mr Right cause I am still right here! 
Haha.. It takes a lot more than that!!! RT I WANT YOU TO MARRY ME 
wassup mattttttt! 
R.I.P Sushila Prem Govind Sinha! My condolences to and his family.. 
Such a long day!!!!! Shoot for krrish3 then rehearsal for big young entertainment awards Tom! Phew! 7 am shift Tom! Gosh!! Tooooo much! Gn! 
Check out this desi remix of MIAs bad girls.. It's siiiiiccckk! .  
jabse tere dost tere nahi rage! 
Wanna wish my friend and beautiful bday girl Kangana ranaut a super happy bday!!! More power to u babe!!!super party!! 
I did wish u aveen! Any way happy belated bday...xoxo 
ok one last time I'll explain..koi mil Gaya was the 1st film in the trilogy,then krrish then krrish 3..like first blood,Rambo then Rambo 3! 
Back to krrish 3!!!always fun to be around Rakesh sir!! Pulls my leg all day!!hmm.. Today I'm feeling active..shud I step on the elliptical? 
doubt urself.. Not me 
Wow! That is overwhelming! Thank u RT this is my PC tattoo...
& u r not even looking at it...
:(  
for sure 
can't afford it yet!;) 
I do beenish 
Awww haha! Thx RT Is your father a baker..? Coz u r sucha cutiepie :) xoxo 
tell me... 
Super evening at the Femina women's awards.thank u guys for yet another readers choice award!bein on a Femina stage again was so nostalgic! 
Haha RT Does giving up a birthday make you a year younger too ? We could all do with that ! 
March 22 is #worldwaterday and I pledge to give up my next birthday for Join me  
it's called RED!!!! 
and ure still my jigri dost!!! So nice to catch up nick! 
Eeeew!! RT There are approximately 5,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000 bacteria in the world 
just remember if the periodic table can comprise all the elements that exist..ur brain can comprise of ur 12th syllabus.. 
Phew! Done! Now letting the rest of my day take over me with 3hrs of sleep... Bring me my coffeeeee! 
Nikon 1 
white 
My driver maqbool Bhai has turned into Schumacher!!! Don't think I need a chopper after all!!! Helllllppppp!! 
For all those asking we're launching a range called Nikon 1 ! And I'm finally wearing Victoria beckham..and yes I do have shoot also today.. 
On my way to the Nikon press conference..launching very cool cameras! But super late!! Eeep! Outfit crisis and then traffic!! Need a chopper 
Last night was too fun!Got"crowned"at the big love CBS Indian glam diva!Haha..reminded me of miss world!Thanx yall for voting so hugely!xoxo 
Still shooting Garnier..
  ,  how cute!! 
Finished crazy late last night..now already on set shooting Garnier..love the Dalmatians..will post puppy pics..I'm in love! 
refrigerators 
Shooting for Samsung with the crazy .... better get dressed soon before he fires me for being tardy!! Teeheehee! 
Virats pure brilliance tonight!Going from my second shoot to the third.thot I'd catch a bit of the match!So worth it!Pride is a good feelin! 
that is what IPL is 
cause I'm shooting!! Gosh! 
not so soon.. Gotta wait till my single! 
good on u ritz!!!! Sooooper! 
Gosh! Crazy few days!! 20 hr days!! And lovin it.. Ok so what act do u guys suggest I do for the IPL opening ceremony.. Shud be so fun!! 
thx sanjana 
Off to shoot barfii and then rehearsals for the balaji awards Tom! Phew! Shud b a good day.."don't worry,be barfii.." 
my condolences 
Well put RT You can have it all. You just can't have it all at once. #gyan 
thank u 
thank u..xoxo 
I doooont! :( 
hey hey 
I'm always there 
thank you..he's coping very well. 
blush blush 
I do amira 
Big hug 
thank u 
Oh noooo! RT : ( "Encyclopaedia Britannica announced today that after 244 YEARS, they were discontinuing their printed edition" 
Hey twitterverse! I'm back from my technology vipassana!!whatd I miss? Y'all for sure... Teehee hee.. 
Got some news!! Im off on a twitter vacation.. Just for a bit..so for all bdays exams n Annivs..lotsa love..and (cont)  
Nice! RT "Happiness can be found even in the darkest of times,if one only remembers to turn on the light"-Dumbledore 
Off to work.. A whole night shoot! I love night shoots.. Gives me time with myself.. Me time is awesome! 
official 
that's painful.. But beautiful 
Raat yun dil mein teri khoyi hui yaad aayi
Jaise veerane mein chupke se bahaar aayi
Jaise saraahon mein haule se (cont)  
  I am in need of music that would flow
Over my fretful, feeling fingertips,
Over my bitter-tainted, trembling (cont)  
happy bday!!! Lots love rock star!! 
 my niece Amaira! Loooove babies!! 
Haha nice RT 
Never trust ur heart bcoz its not on the right side.. 
Listening to good ol Springsteen"I'm on fire" n reading poetry..nice way to spend time between shots..after 2 roller coaster rides,I'll sit! 
Can u guys seriously not just appreciate the written word or have beautiful literary thoughts without looking for some agendas!just enjoy it 
.......Lovers don't finally meet somewhere,
they're in each other all along. 
Rumi 
The minute I heard my first love story,
I started looking for you,
not knowing
how blind that was........ 
how cool! Thank u 
Oh how much I needed a good nights sleep in my bed..off to shoot an ad for Nikon..looking forward! 
yup 
too much fun 
thank u 
engineer 
music 
wud love to 
intelligence 
thank u 
black 
totally confused 
wish I cud 
love to 
better thank u 
sure..haha 
love reading 
wud love to 
found love in a hopeless place -rihanna 
good luck 
june 
hey 
thank u 
hey 
love 
failure.. At anything 
Ok ok..q n a before battery on laptop dies.. 
Headin home today..After almost a month..something amazing about bein told ure loved..when ure welcomed with a hug,the world seems beautiful 
"I still haven't found what I'm looking for..."what a great song... U2 nice! Even"with or without u"....How the words r so beautifully spun 
Wow..Wat a wonderful film warrior is.. Cried bucketful's!!! Any other recommendations? 
As much as i loved chatting with you guys... work beckons! We'll do this again soon - a big hug to you all xoxo 
You get 2 big hugs from me :-) 
Hey Aysha! 
one reply for bangalore and a big hug for pooja!! 
happy belated birthday 
hey whats up 
hiiiii 
hiiiii 
hey Ria 
heyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyy 
hey there! how are you 
hellloooo Ankit 
hi there guys.. what's up 
all the best 
Hey Maike... 
all the best 
all the best 
all the best! 
All the best Ankita! 
I'm so thankful for all the love and support! 
How about today? Hi there 
Do me proud my twitter Rockstar! 
I would love to come to Russia! 
it definitely helps... hahahahaha :-) 
thank you. All my love an regards to everyone in Kerala! 
Hahahaha hi there 
My team is working on it. hopefully will happen 
hahahaha... thanks 
just study hard and breathe :-0 everything will be all right 
I do love Paris... hopefully will be back soon 
all the very best for your exams 
hey Rumana 
Hey Tamanna 
get well soon. Will speak to you soon 
hey Ankita... how are you? 
hahahahaha.. thanks... that's very sweet 
hey swasthi 
hey sofia... lots of love right back at ya 
hey there 
try my best! I love chatting with you guys. 
yup very true :-))) 
I'm very good #thankyousomuchforthelovelycompliment! 
awwww... so sweet. thanks. big hug 
hey there 
very cool Vinisha... 
:-) :-) :-) :-) a bag full of smiles from me to you 
Hey Haneefa. The music is shaping up well. Fingers crossed. A big shout out to South Africa. Love coming there. 
thanks so much Vidhi 
hey nabilah 
of course it's possible... all the very best 
awwwww how sweet. right back at ya! 
hiiiiiiii 
i want to thank all of you in Berlin.. You guys made us feel so welcome and so loved! what a great experience for us all 
hey there. What's up 
thank u zoo much for those kind words 
Hi 
HELLO HELLO HELLO 
All the best for your exams... study hard! 
Says who?? Hey there! 
Hey there Ashish 
:-) thanks 
absolutely! :-) 
awwww how sweet. thank you 
- I don't... only at restaruants with a chef on stand by :-) :-) 
Hey there 
Bonjour Laura... big hug and much love to you 
Rashmi Rashmi Rashmi... yes I am 
all the love and support I get from you guys! 
hey Sakshi... 
All the very bet for ur exam 
awww how sweet...thanks 
Hey sana 
Hey Vandana 
Hiiii Nada. what's up 
hey... whats up 
Thankssss 
Hey Amey 
Hey there 
Dedicated to my lil bro Siddharth and my mom! See... I CAN cook :-) hehehe  
Back on krrish sets..the spirit of krrish is infectious..courage doesn't take super powers..we all have it in us..we just have to believe :) 
tweet some more of ur funny one liners and watch them grow.. 
that's such a cute pic! 
 Is this what balcony seats are? ;) 
On set!! Fun times.. , Ranbir, DP Ravi verman, and pragati  
dude seriously??!! Pls don't do that if u want her to go for u.. 
Nice RT Growing old is
mandatory. Growing up
is optional. 
well if it was ur decision..it was meant to be..either way 
Well enough if that!! Snapping back to the real grown up world where my shot is ready..gotta go!!ciao world..always keep the kid in u alive! 
true..what was that? 
Like..changing ur mind was so much easier then..the repercussions were never so big! Choices now r so scary to make cause they kinda stick.. 
And the funniest us how we all just cudnt wait to grow up..even when our parents told us we'd hate to grow up..how parents r always right!! 
For example..my biggest issues used to be not studying for a test or the cute boy next door or what to wear..aaaah..the days of simplicity.. 
Being a grown up sucks!Too much responsibility..when I was a kid I couldn't wait to be big n independent but now..wish I was back in school, 
Our hotel was such a quaint beautiful place n my room overlooks the mountains..the mist says hello every morning..sigh!!! Soooo romantic! 
I luv small hill stations in india..will miss Darjeeling so much!Had such a good time with team barfii n the city has shown us so much love! 
I had to 
pls!! Shuuuut upppp!!! 
Did a beautiful Darshan at a local shiv temple.. , me n lots of us from barfii crew..Blessed!  
Arre guys nothing soooo serious!! Haha just work not being done on time pisses me off! I hate waiting..so hate to make pple wait too.. 
Pissed off today.. Don't understand people and their behaviour !! Just don't get it! I'm out! 
 Happy Mahashivratri y'all.. Bam bam bam bam bhole!!!! 
 by a river.. So tranquil... 
 clouds in the morning 
Now the cloud kissing my cheeks n whispering in my ears...it's gonna be beautiful they say.. Think I'll believe them.. 
Woke up tired today..ugh..hate getting out of my cosy bed into a cold day..but as I step out..the clouds come n rest on my eyelashes..pretty 
hope u r feeling better sir..@SrBachchan all our love n prayers 
THX BABE 
thnx OQ...IT WAS FUN 
thank u guys.. i totally had fun at the jungli bill ka swayamvar at #filmfare.. glad y'all enjoyed it 
Wrapped finally..Beautiful but looooong steep dark mountainy drive ahead now.. Hmm scary..shud I sleep in the car or watch a movie? 
Happy anniversary mom dad...Thanx for coming here..love u..  
Haha funny..it means!! Dust wind dont come my waaaaaayyyy! 
What does 'looking the other way' mean to u? 
Too much dust on set! And me hugely allergic!! Wah!!!! What a combo!!! Dyyyyying!!!! 
haha! 
hunger 
hunger 
happy bday 
r u sexist? 
nope 
I never went to army school Ambala cantt 
of course..were still in touch 
I was miss world at 17 
darlin u mixed the two names 
Wonder if any of y'all know any of my army school classmates.. Vikas dua.. Avinash mahapatra..still in touch with a few..wondered bout some 
As we grow up we get so consumed by our crazy lives they we forget to just stop and wonder..I think I'll stop at 15! Was a great year for me 
I know..I so wanted to but I'm consumed with krrish right now. 
absolutely..I lived on barrack road 
Sports complexes where we hung out in the evenings to play badminton..haha!how posh!clusters of kids laughing on school buses pained green! 
The same white washed walls..the crisp well maintained gardens..the brick or green outlines..one tonnes driving around..emblems painted.. 
It's amazing how all the cantonments around india have a similar feel..ESP the small towns..being an army brat..takes me to my childhood 
thank u 
Super news for April.. #jimmyiovine u rock! Yay! Say what 
Ok guys I meant every time not every year!Haha! Typo alert! 
I meant every time!! Teehee 
Shooting with super cute bakree babies!! 10 days old!! Awwww!  
Wish I was in mumbai today to vote..every year I do..I implore all of u to..we r the future n make this country what it will be for our kids 
big hug 
Dedicated this morning to the beautiful Whitney.. Listening to her greatest hits while getting ready..she's the voice I grew up on.. 
and I got u guys 
Thank u to all My twitter rockers.. U guys make tweeting so much fun! 
Hey world..good morning..feels good to be back on set..ESP barfii..such a special film..too much fun with 
Sometimes u just wanna be proved wrong........ 
will happen soon for sure!! 
Gn world.. Tom back home.. Barfi beckons.. Here I come darjeeling! 
thank u xoxo always 
Thank u for all ur support tweeples! Love u all! 
This one is for u mom.. Huge Bruce Springsteen fan..  
great night at the grammys n the after party..sad I missed the red carpet.. but Jennifer Hudson singing I'll always love u was the highlight 
A special behind the scenes pic only 4 U. On my way to the Grammys.In a Gauri Nainika original! What say guys? 
Ok hair up or down? 
I know it's started .. Don't think I'll make red carpet.. Just landed! Will make the show tho! Better planning next time 
God! I hope I make it on time for at least the show! May miss red carpet tho!!! Let's hurry glam squad! 
get well soon sir .. Love and respect always 
Ok guys!! Grammy time!Just landed into LA.. options of gowns.. Indian designer or western..?Hmmm..I'm biased towards wearing Indian talent.. 
Gonna try and catch up on sleep..get away into zzzzzland where the world is devoid of anything bad or sad..just beauty and happiness.. 
LA bound..the Grammys will be sad.. Such a tremendous loss to the world .."there can be miracles..when u believe.. somehow u will"thank u. 
"Bitter sweet..memories..that is all..I'm taking..with me..so goodbye..pls don't cry"RIP Whitney..u made me believe in magic and dreams.. 
Had a lovely time at berlinale..thank u Germany for being so kind..now for 2hrs of zzzzzs and off to LA... 
thank u 
done! 
Onslaught of tweets saying Saree... Ok done!! Saree for berlinale tonight and gown for Grammys Tom.. Thx for ur help guys! 
So...dilemma.... What to wear for berlinale red carpet ..Saree or gown!!!!!!???? 
 a walk in the park... Beautiful mom for company.. Being giggly girls and eating bratwurst ... 
The Jewish memorial....  
The beautiful victory tower...  memories of shooting here..what fun! 
So much love that the Berliners showed us last night..felt overwhelmed..thank u for comin n tolerating the bitter cold to say hi.c u tonight 
 beautiful Berlin... Cold and stunning! Had a great time at berlinale press con yest..tonight red carpet..funnnnn! 
in transit...looking forward to Brrrrrrlin! what a wonderful place..shud b there in a few hours..grateful for courage.. strength..love..life 
what r the things u r grateful for? 
so no matter how tuff it is.. pick up the pieces and thank god fr all u have.. and how much he has given u..im so grateful for my family.. 
and then the time comes when u sit down n reflect...U r responsible for ur happiness..u r responsible for urself..noone else..and thats true 
says who! U r as lucky as u think u r 
So true RT Get what you can- and what you get "nurture"!! #mylifelessons 
thank u .. I appreciate that.. 
done! But u shud be there..Don 2 without Don!!! Booooo! Feel better soon! Will adhere to all specified rules Don! 
Last shoot day of this schedule for krrish 3!! Will miss the film..but be back soon..for now..bye bye hot Hydrabad..hello freezing Berlin! 
Beautiful sunset... Moon out too...  
thank u 
Haha RT :-) "Are you free tomorrow?" , "No, I'm expensive, Sorry"... 
for what??? 
thank u.. 
It's so amazing and symbolic how the darkness always gives way to sunshine..  ..the moon on our set as I sit for makeup! 
happy bday amira 
Up n about.. In more ways than one.. Heading for super early morning shoot..last to days then a whirlwind trip across the world..naaaice! 
On demand.. Me n Ileana on set.. Team barfii all the way..  
Wow! 2mill.. OMG! Thank u guys!!for all ur love n support.. #pcmaniacs u guys rock! So overwhelming! Xoxo always 
don't believe everything u read.. :) 
:) RT I don't dream at night, I dream all day; I dream for a living. ~ Steven Spielberg 
Hung out with ileana yest..she was shooting next door,had such a good time in barfi..all the kids on my set were going crazy seeing her!cute 
Woke up smiling..U know the best place to derive strength and happiness? From beautiful memories..did that all morning..music n daydreams!:) 
and u r holding the competitions camera..tsk tsk!!! 
 beautiful sunset in Hyd.. 
Thank u all for saying such nice things about zee..I'm up and on my way to shoot as the darkness engulfs me and adele sets fire to the rain! 
it's been 10 yrs!!was17 then! 
Nervous and excited about ur reactions since this was my first try at being a host for an awards show! Let me (cont)  
No sunrise yet! Pitch dark in Hydrabad!only my team and the street dogs for company! Cooold! Brrrr!tho it Gets super hot by morning! 
Waaaaay too early to b up! God! Tottering to shoot! Sunrises r so pretty! 
 
Hindi film 
 just for old times sake.. I'll miss u Rajji..had just met him at my trial for don 2..he always encouraged me..till date 
Saddens me so much,my 1st director Raj Kanwar passed away..RIP Rajji..U believed in me when even I didn't.Andaaz taught me everything I know 
Love music.. Has such an amazing effect on me.. Thunder road Bruce Springsteen.. Secret garden...love his voice.. 
of course I remember 
happy bday to ur hubby 
awwww n we miss u!!! 
Haha naice! RT You hate drama? Cool. Stop starting it. 
not yet.. But r u in LA? 
thank you vish 
hey..long time.. Wassup? 
happy happy bday ! My super rock star! 
thank u 
y? 
Wanna wish the lovely and a super happy wedded life..love and happiness always..cudnt b there because of shoot in Hyd :( 
Happy bday .. A girl I truly admire for her courage! Wishing u happiness always 
Mrs Roshan in da house! Pinky aunty teaching me patience!  .. 
Early morning on the sets of krrish 3.. Love starting new films..feels like a new beginning..slept well after days! Hehe! 
Very out of sorts..Bruised from falling during rehearsals.too much damage...god this act better be good! Looking forward to Filmfare tonight 
Too much to do today.. Shooting for bru then another shoot and then stage rehearsal for Filmfare!! Gawd!! It's a wonder I'm still standing.. 
Decisions decisions.. It's time! 
Phew.... Loooong day.. Shoot for barfi then press con for #agneepath now off to rehearse for Filmfare!!! Yiiikes! Hope I can keep up! 
Off to shoot for Barfee and rehearsal for Filmfare.. Buzzing with excitement on #agneepath tho .. Yaaay! Thank u for loving #kaali ! 
Yay thank u everyone! #agneepath day one 25cr ! Unprecedented! Feels sooo awesome! Team agneepath u rock! 
happy bday 
thank u ash! 
I can multitask.. Haha 
Having a blast chatting with everyone on the UTV voice chat with Tata Docomo users... still a while to go. dail 59999 and join in the fun! 
must c it n tell me what u thot.. Xoxo 
guys send me r reviews on #agneepath soon.. I'm dying to hear what y'all think and carry boxes of tissues.. ull need em! touches ur heart.. 
had a great time at the apsara awards last night..entertainer of the year..now thats an award i didn't expect..dunno how to do anything else 
happy republic day everyone... #agneepath releases today.. nervous and super excited..i hope all of u like the film.. I'm so proud of it! 
Amazing screening for #agneepath last night with the cast n crew.. karan malhotra take a bow! Kaali Aali re aali!!! 
Now this i like..  
thank u ram 
Destination next-delhi!! Team #agneepath here I come.. Bring it on world!!! 
Hong kong airport..finally ate after almost a day..thank u Macau for a wonderful show..feels amazing to get satisfying work done.... 
Cause everyone is eventually where they wanna be.. Or they'd change it!!! Live it up twitter verse.. One life..live it on ur terms! 
live the life we want to life..not what we r forced to..It's too short to be unhappy..I choose happiness.. 
Shocked at the news of nikhat kazmis sad demise.. She just reviewed Don 2.. Wow..unpredictability of life..RIP..my prayers to her family.. 
Haha!!! RT choose beer.. :p 
Priorities for this trip..family time..shoot for a commercial today and rehearsal tonight!!And that's just today! Jeeeeepers! 
 ferrying to Macau.. The ocean calms me.. I'm so excited my parents r coming..dad gonna hang out with me after so long.. 
Boarded!phew..made it by the skin of my teeth!But here goes.hosting for the first time.hope all the rehearsals with and team pay off 
I'm so sorry dimple 
Headed to the airport..will miss going with the #agneepath team to khaleej times and the mall.. :( sucks! I'm so sorry dubai! Off to Macau! 
thank you ;-) 
how sweet. thanks! 
Team #Agneepath on the go... with &Apoorva! Press conference done...now onwards to Khaleej Times!  
seriously !! That's my characters name dummy 
Kaliiiii... Aali re aali!!!!! 
Sooo excited to promote #agneepath ..one of films I had most fun on!! miss u in dubai! 
thx babe.... 
Yay RT Saw promos of 7 UTV films releasing in 2012. Easily, BARFI stands out. Wait for it. 
Im so glad u think so.its a special film #barfii RT Ranbir kapoor and Priyanka Chopra is going to give shock to the audience. 
Landed into lovely dubai!! giving trying to convince me to get to the gym!!yeesh! Promotion..so Team #agneepath ..let's do this! 
Strange r those days when I have nothing to say...hmm...hope yall r Well. 
aapko Bhi .now what to say..if u insist,jungli billi n don ka competition will continue in Macau teehee hee!Congrats on best actor! 
the winning pictures are up on my Facebook page... go check it out :) 
drumroll please... it's announcement time... Michelle & Yogmitra... you guys are my favorite posers. See you in Macau! it's gonna be fun! 
Now shooting barfii..and prepping for the Zee awards..hosting for the 1st time..having kittens!taking tips from all friends who've hosted! 
All u well wishers make everything worthwhile! Had too much fun performing too!my fav songs!hung out with friends..all in all super night! 
Super cool winning best actor in a negative part for SKM and best Jodi for Don2 at screen!thank u all for always being so supportive! 
sorry ..couldn't make it for #filmfareNominationNight but it rocked I heard..will make up.. Big hug 
that's hilarious!! Probably True actually 
True love is the souls recognition of its counterpoint in another .. Aaaah! Saw it in a film.. So true 
Thanks Palak 
How cool is that!!! Thanks so much 
awww how sweet is that. Thank you. 
Uffffff...this is a really tough task!Can't decide the 2 most stylish people who get to join me in Macau..need help!  
It's so true what someone said..in ur troubles u know ur true friends.. Love u 
And... just a few hours left before we select the 2 lucky peeps who will join me in Macau!! what fun... 
just looking at pictures posted on the BPFT page... loads of stylish peeps out there! I wanna see more, so post now  
:-) now you know! Check out the URL :-) 
so... if you wanna join me in Macau... here's how you do it... log on NOW  
Some of you may already know what I’m talking about. For those who don't... I have something fun in mind... watch this space for more.. 
Phew...it's been a long day. Am so looking forward to my photo shoot in Macau next week where 2 really special people are going to join me! 
Morning world..why is it that when we wake up after a nightmare the world seems so scary!! Think I need to watch cartoons!! 
Yeeeesh!Feel sick yest..Hate it!Got so much work to do!Loooove my job..Teaches me that I can be anything I wanna be..u shud believe that too 
Wow! My rockstar RT babe..plzz come online and say something about my tattoo  logo is permanent..love you 
Okay..so my lil break lasted about 4 hrs haha!now off to watch #agneepath ! Can't wait for you guys to c it!! Gun gun gunaaaaa y'all! 
Wishing a super hottie a huge bday shoutout!! More power to u girl! 
Thank u my twitter rockstars for wishin me a happy anniversary..I love the fact that #pctwitteranniversary is trending!u make me feel so spl 
Heading back to mumbai to my family.. Missed them..thank u aurangabad for all ur love and affection..sometimes u just need a hug.mommy yay 
Film wrap on Kunal kohlis..I think i was made only to entertain.. Thank u for ur wonderful response to gun gun guna from #agneepath..love u 
Kunal kohlis untitled film.. The same one we r shooting now 
happy bday in advance 
Happy bday babe... Have a super year!!!xoxoxo! 
shooting there.. 
hey.. I really wanna come to Lima.. Have a friend there.. 
bad looooosers!!! Haha! 
me toooo 
Gosh!! Slept so early that I'm up for shoot super early..fully fresh..beautiful dawn at aurangabad.. Pic from yest..  
I wanna meet that boy!!!! Haha!! 
Awww too cute RT You'll have to watch this to believe it! Pls show it to ! She'll love it too much! :)  
In my way back home.. Planes!!A two day getaway with my besties was much needed! Off to aurangabad for Kunal kohlis film tonight.. Pheeeew 
Big lesson learnt last year!all we can do is give it the best we have,and enjoy the ride..waqt se pehle Aur kismat se zyaada kuch nahi Milta 
..and to all of u guys!!who make me what I am..huge shutout!!happy new year and let's make it count..work hard and party harder!! 
Here's to my #Don2 team..Wherever u all r..wishing that this year is as amazing as it was making our film.proud to be team Don! Miss u guys! 
Hello world!New year!New beginnings..that's what my year is gonna be..washed off of all things bad..starting a new slate..bring it on 2012! 
Oh.. I cud vegetate on the beach forever...  
pls don't say such things.. Love u 
Oh.. Sneak peek before I go.. #agneepath  
Taking off world.. Will try posting pics!! Have a super 2012 and spread the love!! One life..let's live it! 
hope u have a super 2012!! Spread the love 
sorry aveen.. 
thank u 
Finally the time if the year for changes..off for my secret getaway for a day..into my world of dreams...have a super new years and b safe!! 
As always it's been such fun chatting with you guys... I gotta go now.. but will be back for more :-) 
Hahahaha... nice try Apoorv 
Hey Sharan 
Hey there 
Hiii Sagar 
hey Ankit 
nope.... just glad to see everyone here 
thanks 
hey dina 
hahahahaha. Hello 
hiii amira 
thank you so much 
hiiii 
Hello Hello 
Hahahaha nice one Ram... Happy New year 
hey Kusal 
hi there 
Thanks Daanish 
no contest... just trying to reply to as many as possible. Hi there 
thanks so much 
thank you so much 
Hi Fateen and to everyone else in Indonesia! 
hiiii Sania 
Hey Amrit.. Yes, Jan 26, 2012 
Hey Zaker 
hiiiiiii 
hi 
thank you so much 
hahahahaha nice! 
Hiiiii 
thanks so much Pooja 
Here's one from the Junglee billi 
thank you so much 
Hi 
3 or 4... depends on the producers :-) 
hey there 
Thanks... wish you the same 
ooops... but glad u liked the film 
Hey jatin 
Hi Pritika 
Hey there 
Hey Lucky... how's it going? 
Hey there Amey 
Thanks Shikar 
Hey there 
Hi Vijay 
Thanks Naseef 
hey aastha 
Hey Ankit 
Shooting for Kunal Kohli's next with Shahid Kapoor 
Thanks Megha 
Hey Pradip 
I would love to come to Egypt... but sadly no plans as of now 
Hi Husaina 
Hey there 
that is so sweet Amira. Thank you so much 
hahahahahaha 
Thanks Disha... u too 
Thanks so much 
Thanks Rakesh 
Hey Kajal - I'm good... How are you? 
happy new year and thanks 
thank you so much 
awwww. thanks so much 
Hey! 
heya Goks :-) 
hello 
it's all thanks to you guys! 
awwww thanks so much 
Happy Belated birthday Niki. Hope you had a good one! 
Really looking forward to talking to you all today.... RT Hey guys and gals... before 2011 ends, (cont)  
Happy bday my rockstar .. 
duh!! 
A friend told me an awesome quote by Mae west... To err is human.. But it feels divine! Haha! Love her quotes! Tis the season to b bad #don2 
what happened babe? Again? 
 New song from agneepath.. O SAIYAAN... one of my fav tracks.. say whaaaaa? 
 beautiful sunset at madh..Heading to shoot for dabboo ratnanis calendar from shooting! Phew! Long day! 
big hug 
haaaapy bday 
Now home alone.. BooHoo! But working like crazy so will try and compensate for missing them..what r ur new year plans? 
Toooo early to wake up man!ESP when Christmas spirts in the house..My family's been leaving for our holiday in installments since 3 days.ha! 
Merry Xmas guys...may we all be blessed with peace and contentment..n the happiness to live and love..and be loved..Thank u all for lovin me 
Morning guys.. Ur overwhelming love makes the world so beautiful.. I'm off the work but think the day will be a trudge!  
So who's up for a quick chat? I'm live on Airtel Live Chat discussing Don 2 and everything else. Call 5050503 and talk to me! 
Thanx y'all for ur amazing response to #don2 !And so glad ure also liking the #agneepath trailer!I'm back to work..at shoot for 
Trueeeee RT It's the day before #Christmas! :D 
Big day for me..Don 2 hits theaters & now the launch of the 2nd trailer of Agneepath -  - let me know what U guys think! 
On my way to IMAX wadala to launch the 2nd theatrical of agneepath now..Gonna be launched with #DON2 so look out for it and send me feedback 
Thank u so much guys for all ur overwhelming love on #DON2 wow!! Lemme know what u guys thot of the film..Was amazing at the screenings yest 
Thaank uRT i saw first day first show of don2 and then second show as well!
loved it too much .. ! 
Just landed back from Patna..final leg of promotions over..was too much fun..thank u so much for all ur love phew..now butterflies.. #Don2 
thank you so much for your tweets and letter 
Hey Natasha! 
I did read it... thank you so much! 
- Roma roma roma... happy birthday :-) 
Don 2 in theatres in the UK and Belgium right now! Are you watching? 
How cool is this RT@FarOutAkhtar 
Check this out.. Flash mob at Ambience mall does 'zaraa dil ko thaam lo'!! Classic!  
"@FarOutAkhtar: We're launching Don 2 board games this afternoon at oberoi Mall in mumbai... Come one come all... Let the games begin." 
"@KaranMalhotra21: Listen to the album Agneepath  #nowplaying #gaana" 
So many memories came flooding back from my childhood. So happy to be back here in Kanpur. Thanks soo much for the love. Onward to Indore 
Thank u Jaipur for all the love & support. Big Hug RT The Don 2 team takes Crystal Mall Jaipur by storm!  
Morning Jaipur... feels great to be in your city! Catch the entire Don team at Crystal Palm Mall at 11:00 am today. Cant wait 2 see u guys 
Krrish 3 as this is a trilogy. Koi mil gaya..krrish.. Then..krrish 3 RT ma'm, its #Krrish2 or #Krrish3. Do clear. 
Bob dylan.. RT Who's this Dylan? 
Shooting krrish 3.. Sooo awesome to be back on this set..Rakesh sir, kangana, hrithik, Vivek, tooooo fun. Then tonight joining my #Don2 team 
Truuuueeee that!! 'I don't wanna be rich..I don't wanna be famous..i don't even wanna be happy..I just wanna be great...!!'- Dylan 
Scaaary!!RT Looking fwd to Gun Gun Guna #Agneepath.Saroj Khan puts in Madhuri's league as a dancer!Take a bow PC! 
Thx saloni... Ure too sweet!! 
One of the coolest things about Don is his killer lines. If you think you can match up, then here's your chance! (cont)  
Ok guys... That was super fun.. Well do it again for sure.. beckons.. Stay #junglibilli always.it's too much fun...xoxoxoxo 
Im BOTH!! RT r u #junglibilli or #desigirl. 
Me too.. 
RT I become junglii billi when I see lauki in dinner :):) 
Haha.RT whn thrs a pimple whn u hav to go for sum weddin #junglibilli 
Tell himRT get #junglibilli when i c shahnwz talkin to other girls,he is cutest n goodlooking tchr in my univrsty,hv crush on him. 
Awwww RT I be a #junglibilli when my bro said that I can't go out alone :P 
Eeeesh! Me too..im too impatient RT I'm #junglibilli when there is a slow driver in front of me :/ 
Hahaha! Nice!RT My gf becomes a junglibilli wen I wear black boxers in bed :P 
Hahha! RT My behena [sis] epitomises #junglibilli & is synonymous to the word *I hope she is not reading this* :D 
Ooooh..i feel u..RT I'm a totalllll #junglibilli when my dad, mum or bro check my phone :P 
God id love to.. RT im #junglibilli when i extreme tired then there's guest come to my home,feel wanna kick them away! 
Awww not at all RT ths 16 yr old by s hvng crsh upn ur cousin aftr u.hpe #junglibilli dznt gt angry. :P 
Hahaha.. RT My ex Gf used to become a jungli billi if she was told she was getting overweight .. #junglibilli 
Eeeeeek! RT I get #junglibilii when a rat crosses my way 
Hahahah! Naice RT i will get jungli if theres no Don 3!! #junglibilli 
Hahaha for sure! RT One girl that liked me climbed into my window and threw a pile of doo doo in my pillow. #junglibilli ?? 
Yup! Clawwws! RT #junglibilli when a doggy gets in MY way!!! *meowwww!!!* 
NiceRT my exgalfren was #junglibilli As she ws fearless... #Lizards #cockroaches nothing scared hr at all n she's mybest fren nw 
HahaRT all the timee! So far have only met junglibilli! No luck w quietbilli at all. :( wouldn't mind if u were my #junglibilli! :) 
Nice.. Hehe.. RT imm jungli when i do not see a PC movie once a day haha :p #junglibilli 
Till then..me! RT Don loves his #junglibilli.... So does we all.. Yet to come across one 
Me tooooo! RT 
i m super jungli wen my younger bro hides my stuff :/ #junglibilli 
Haha!thats not jungli but too funny RT #junglibilli When I snuck into my boyfriend's apartment & FLEW through the window!:-) 
Awww RT my #JungliBilli --> . We became frnds online and have met once in real lyf as well :) 
Ha!RT My ex gf knocked me out cold when I was teaching her kickboxing--a strong uppercut is definitely a junglebilli feature! 
Yes I will RT the best #junglibilli stories! Let's go.. Gotta b on set soon.... I'm jungli when I don't get sleep... Meow! 
So come on all u ladies out there.Tell me some of ur #JUNGLIBILLI stories.When were u truly jungli? Boys?Any of u come across any such girls 
So I heard #JUNGLIBILLI was trending last night..I missed it.. Awww..saw the first copy of #Don2 !cant wait for u guys to c it..I'm Badass! 
So who wants to be a 'Social Mobster'? Here's your chance then... log on to  and make it happen! Fully fun! 
Heheh.. Say whaaa? RT  don 2 !!! looking super hot !!!! 
Such a privilege to be in their presence..their kindness to me n my family over the years has been so overwhelming.. Happy bday Yusuf saheb. 
Saira ma'am and him have such a lovely love story,and are so cute together,only eyes for each other.may God let everyone find love like that 
Went to Dilip Sahibs 90th bday party last night..what an unbelievably charming gentleman..we sat there enjoying beautiful ghazals and dinner 
Aaaaight guys.Gotta go.@basuanurag beckons! Barfiiiiiiiiiiiii! Have a fab night and don't let the moon make u loony..it's workin on me! Xoxo 
Proud of my baby sis Parineeti Chopra! u go girl! More Power to the Chopras!! 
 on set... s hair styling bag!! Haha she's a messssss! 
hey sakshi 
Yup.. We r! RT r u and kat friends 
hey 
absolutely.. And every girl shud be 
gotta finish my movies too 
yes I'll be at berlinale with the Don 2 team@aggi89_pz 
Toooooooo funny!! Haha!RT ur da most bizarre actreess 
Yup.. Its true.. RT heyy is it true dat kept your name piggychops? 
If i do then what? Hehe RT I swear only if tweeted me? I love this lady too much, she is the asian Cheryl Cole! 
aawww.. Thk u..who is that beautiful baby 
I remember..n u arnt alone..RT am the guy who screamed"junglee billi"repeatedly in DIFF dubai film fest 2 days back..hope u rmember 
wow.. Where is that pic on ur dp? 
Haha.. Thx babe..RT being a gal im saying " PC i love your legs, they are gorgeous" . . Im sorry bt i mean it ! love you loadz 
Don 2 releases 23rd dec yall..... I'm seeing the film for the first time Tom... Yikes.. Nervous.. 
then don't look 
hey hey 
jungli bill.... Hehe@iamzekeobaid 
wassup avi 
Tell the devil I said hey when u get back to where ure from.. Haha.. I love that line.. Gotta love Bruno mars 
thx sibtain I read it.. And that means a lot to me.. 
Yaaay!RT Hung out with at the studio this morning.Heard some of her music. DAMN GIRL!! This stuff's gonna explode!! 
Thanx J.. Muah RT Okay damn EXCITED about DON 2. It's going to be a majaa nu life situation. My bests to shah, farhan and pc. 
hey guys..wassupppppp???? 
 say whaaaaa? 
sexiest lips... Oooh me likey.....@jiteshpillaai 
pheeeewwww! Ok sir! Sabak seekh liya.. Bhaad mein jaaye Rihanna aur uske tweets! Love u 2 and have a good day 
Alright guys.imma b a good girl now and quietly go to work.teeheehee..think I shud shuttup for a bit.. Haha!have a brilliant day loves! 
sir retweet tha.... Haaaaw! don't naaaa...(blush blush)@SrBachchan 
it does.. Kiddaaaan?? 
sir ab apse compare karne ki haisiyat nahi hai na... Wow.. Respect sirjee.. 
u shud too...@RautSamir 
awww I had too much fun at my prom.. Wud have loved to go with u. 
u shunt be.. Have fun... 
don't worry.. ..it's just funny.. 
I know.. But Rihanna tweeted it!@Pooja291 
we cal it krrish 3 cause koi mil Gaya was the first film of the trilogy... 
Ooops! Sorry uncle...RT you might wanna say Uncle instead of Aunty! #nooffense 
kiddaaaaaaaaan???? 
So..Doin craazy two shifts..Sleepin only 4 hrs..but whats life if it ain't crazy Yaaal! Krrish3 yesterday..barfee today..Dubai for don2 Tom 
Sorry aunty....RT dear beti you have many senior followers - please do not even mention the 4 letter word in your tweets. love 
wow thank u for ur letter..I'm touched.. It means a lot.. Love to new Zealand... 
have babies... 
.....Thank you Dev sahib... For being u and leaving us with ur incredible legacy...u shall be missed... RIP.. 
The last thing he told me was"tum humare zamane mein actress kyon nahi thi.."His charm,his energy and his zest for life..u taught us to live 
Lemme know what u think? [Dialogue Promo 2] Don 2 - Junglee Billi:  
Feeling terrible..literally!Unwell & thrfre unable to make it for the Top Gear awrds.Sorry I let U down - will make it up 2 U 
Mora piya from rajneeti.. Naaaice.. 
I agree 
Tell me some of ur retro favs.. Now I'm on ace of base.. It's a beautiful life.. Gosh.. Reminds me of early school days... 
No guys! I'm not in California..Californication is a song by Red Hot Chilli Peppers...I'm in mumbai shooting a killer song for 
The sun me rise in the east but at least it's settled in a final location.......loooove californication..that's the vibe this morning guys.. 
Say wha?RT Our bonafide bombshell ends 2011 with a bang as the cover girl for Vogue 12/11  
happy bday bomzi sir!!! Gotta do some FIFA soon.... Have a soooper year! Love.. Love... 
Let's have some fun :-) RT Catch on facebook for a LIVE chat at 8:00 p.m. (IST) -  ! 
New song"Dushman Mera' is here from Don 2... Enjoy!  .... What say? 
hi kaukab 
says who??? 
I wanna wish my sooooper rockstar a very happy birthday.. Ure my rock babe... Love u lots.. 
Thank u for all ur titles guys but none of them worked so far...if u think of something.. Let us know.. Meanwhile me on set 
Hahahahaha... RT I got 99 chores and It's Bad Enough having to do one. ~ Lay-Z 
It's so good to be bad! Sticks n stones may break my bones but chains n whips excite me...-rihanna... Bwaaahhhaaha.. Me likey likey.. 
a huge belated bday shoutout to the brilliant ! Thank u for all ur incredible contribution to music! Loooove.... 
Did u know apparently Jay-z wrote 99 problems for his dog!! Haha.. Now re hear the lyrics n ill c what I'm saying... 
guess u shud stop watching movies if u feel so.. 
hey hey durga 
and what's wrong with Indian songs?? 
me toooooo 
I looooove.... 
If u got girl problems..I feel bad for u son..I got 99 problems but a bitch ain't one!! ....Jay-Z 
It's a super fun movie!So well written by ..anyway this mornin is dedicated to old school hip hop..biggie,2pac,b2k,lil Kim,Jay z 
Like kunal said..the film is a love story based in 3 different eras.. Let's keep em comin....thank yallll! 
Good morning world...2nd day on kunals film..Come on guys.. Suggest some names for the title of the movie and if we like it..hmmm..surprise! 
that's an awesome t shirt... Thanx babe... 
And it's a schedule wrap on #barfii .. Come on crew.. Wheres the party tonight?? 
"Ill stop when im at the very top..U shitted on me on ur way up..it's 'bout to be a scary drop..cause what goes up must come down.."eminem 
Eminem quote unquote.. New age poet.. I looove 'lighters' ! totally inspiring! 
let these words b like a blade 2 a haters rib cage n let it b known frm dis day 4ward,I wanna say thx cuz ur hate is what gave me strength 
 on set.. Heya girlie.. Thanx for comin... 
 local onlookers on sets.. #barfii 
 and dop Ravi varman on set.... #barfii 
Ok gotta go rockstars.. beckons.... Xoxoxoxo... 
..Or any other traits u may have.But u gotta believe.. In ur dreams..Only if u dream big will u rule the world.. That's a PC original.Haha.. 
Ok guys..gonna explain what I meant..Only if u believe in urself will the world believe in u..U can spice up confidence with humility,humor, 
I'm stoked!! Back home tomorrow!Yay..Got a crazy sched lined up but something tells me I'm gonna fly thru it...will miss shooting barfee tho 
"I only reason I shone is because everyone else was so bad..."-Steve Jobs.I love it! Brilliance requires arrogance...that makes confidence! 
A huge bday shout out to mu lil sis love u baby.. 
Congrats ... Wish I was there!! Pls wish ur family from my side.. Lots oflove and big hugs.. 
hehe! Hugs! 
will do!!! Keepin it all ready... 
Beautiful pollachi! Naaaice....  
Cold river water hitting my feet.A smile on my face and warmth in my heart.Life cudnt be more perfect...  
Early morning shoot. For barfee in beautiful. Pollachi... Very happy to be back on this set.. Such fun! !!! 
Feeling blaaaaah! Yeeesh! 
Congrats Incredible!!A huge Welcome to ur baby granddaughter...Lots of love health happiness to Ash and ABjr too! 
Too much..I wanna go back to LA.... 
you've got talent! 
hey prantik 
thanks so much huzeifa 
how you feeling now? Hope all is well. Talk soon 
Hahahaha! Hi there 
Hey Namrata 
hey Ronit 
Found love in a hopeless place by Rihanna 
I did :-) 
hola! how goes it 
Hey there 
a big chance. All the best for the short stories 
positive thinking always helps :-) hey there 
thanks for the info :-) 
hahahaha... nice. Hey there chandan 
tsk tsk... it's what don calls my character in the film! Watch and then respond 
hey there 
hahahahaha... that's so not true... how creative of you!! 
hey there 
hey Parag 
you should check your replies more often then! 
It feels weird to reply to myself... time for you to change your twitter handle! 
thanks mangesh 
thanks. loved it 
awww... get well soon 
get well soon ! 
a big shout out to Rani... from me and Aly! 
Happy birthday Shailav 
Hey Tinny... how are ya? 
Hey there Dhawal 
hey Daniel! 
Hahahaha... you're right! 
good morning 
All the best! 
Happy birthday 
Surprise revealed! RT Katrina kaif is doing a full on item song in AGNEEPATH...its a total swinging number called CHIKNI CHAMELI!! 
Music dance and other 'items' are on the cards...can't say more...except it's sooooper exciting! 
Saw the new trailer of agneepath that's gonna come out!Wow!Take a bow karan malhotra!look forward to some sexy surprises u don't expect!fun! 
bigger waaaaaaaaaaaah!!! 
as long as u play the mother alien!!hahah 
me toooooo... waaaaah! 
So.. whats the goss? what have i missed for a month? fill me in rock stars... 
A HUUUUGE HAPPY BDAY TO THE BEST BHAIYA EVER.. LOVE U LOTS... 
Hello twitter world...so Im back..landed into Delhi late last night...jet lags killin me.straight to work.hope i can still stand by night... 
Hold on guys.. slow n steady...ull see my look in Don2 soon enough! And I'm super excited about it...for now..Zara dil ko tham lo....big up! 
Alisha that letter means so much to me.. U r truly a PC rockstar... Thank u.. I'm touched.. 
Here u go guys : Don2 title track  ....@DuttaLara looking soooo beautiful and Don...well rocks it... 
hahaha... C u guys soon! 
happy bday ...PC rockstar in the house...... 
Told ya!!!! My rockstars r awesome.. 
 
End of a super awesome day...  dave,amii, and ! Looooove this song! Smaaaaaash! 
truuuuuuuueee that! 
So...what shud we write about tonight .. Any ideas twitter world? 
Meri taraf se aap sabko gurpurab di lakh lakh wadhaiyaan.... Wahe guruji da Khalsa..wahe guru ji di fateh... 
This one is it! let's show some desi love.. RT in the studio with and .. 
Back home soon.. Last few days here in LA..looking forward to seeing what's up back home. Last minute whirlwind to finish off work..Lovin it 
of course I saw it.. Jimmy played me some of ur stuff comin up.. Brilliant.. So exciting..heard u in portugal? 
yup been in studio every single day....awesomeness... 
hey hey hey.... How u doing.... All is great.. Crazy working.. U in Sydney? 
Heard some amazing k'naan music... He's brilliant.. So inspiring..was great to meet him.. U guys like?? 
Under the weather today.. Ugh.. Gonna c a doc n then head to work.. Gosh I hate being ill.. Got a sicccck song to do today tho so excited! 
Loved it! U guys Were brilliant..xoxo Magic with and the amazing  
writers block...... yuck!! brain dead i think... ufff... HELP sam watters 
I love this track....think we got something goin here!! 
sounding good?? Say whaaaa? 
Why is it that food always looks better on someone else's plate....? 
happy bday puja 
Serious studio sessions for the last two days.Tooo amazing.Teaching double shifts to everyone here...haha!BTW ure a slave driver 
yaaaay! 
 new poster of Don 2.... Say whaaaa? 
hehe! 
hehe! 
thanx babe.. Hehe 
Hitting the sack in a biggish kinda way..... Shattered... Zzzzzzzzs on the way... Gn world.... 
Here's wishing the true king of hearts a super happy birthday... May u always have happiness, peace and love..G.one forever.. 
 cutting vocals today... My view from the booth.... Hehe 
Yay!! Phew....RT killin vox. 
ok so now u r officially a PC rockstar... That video was awesome.. Ure too talented and sweet.. Loves and big hug!!!!xoxoxo... 
 and ..songwriter duo... Makin some magic.. Kill it chicas..... 
Late night magic...  in da house with her dazzling body art.. Show it off girl!! 
halloween in the studio... loud music.. crazy beats.. party in the house... this one blows thru the roooooof!!! 
a lil harder.. Muah... 
happpppppyyy bday.... And lots of love.... PCsTwitter rockstar 
thank u baby... Ure too kind... 
I am unbelievably tired.... Long day in the studio.. Standing in the booth for so long is killing my feet..
Phew... Still a while to go... 
seriously!! Learn just how to be nice... God! 
Ok guys.. Headin into the booth... Phew... Be kind ..... C u soon..xoxoxo xoxo.. 
thank u ..hope my beautiful India has been a great experience for u..Come on guys...show this brilliant performer some desi love! 
so up n about.. heading back into the studio.. gosh.. i loooove making music.. its so organic that everything about u spills out... 
don't do that.. Thin of the beautiful times and forgive 
don't...she's a person.. And a very nice girl.. Try and c that..xoxo 
I wanna wish everyone celebrating Diwali anywhere in the world lots of love and togetherness.I miss my family today..thank god I have u guys 
For all those haters out there,constantly spewing venom will only make sure some of it stays on u..see the beauty in people..everyone has it 
You know sometimes I just wonder..What is with the haters..is it just gaining pleasure by hurting someone else?what do people get out of it? 
hi hanan.. And thank u... 
I love the guitar...so beautifully encompasses any emotion with it's chords..angst..love..misery..anger..joy.. So lucky r pple who play... 
Second Trailer of Don2.... What say u guys?  
hey amey... 
also u ..shoutout and a follow to 
all right guys! Just cause my twitter rockstar says so..let's c what u got.... Let's do this! 
hey hey hey.... 
and I love y'all.....@polarbear8213 
never were 
Gosh..i sang on that show..hahaRT@IndiasDesirable #Episode19 ofIndia's Most Desirablewill feature Priyanka Chopra.Sunday,9 p.m.on Star World 
Bwahahahah! RT I'm jealous of my parents because I'll never have a kid as cool as theirs.. ;) 
take me with u.... Hahaha 
for all u guys asking im on an upside down timezone cause im in LA... not in mumbai.. waaaasssuuup tweeterzzz? 
arre ure always in the constant state of broken heartedness.... hahah! u doin ok chica?? 
ok.. so start...hahahahah!! 
 and in da house!! This ones a Smaaaash for sure!! 
Hahaha RT The awkward moment when you walk into your wardrobe and don't end up in Narnia :/ 
Back 2 the studio.Writin these lyrics r really giving me an insight to myself.They say what u write is ur reflection..damn mine r dark..haha 
 in the studio again.. Singing a killer song today... in da house.. 
looooooove s new video....love in a hopeless place..pure brilliance..! check it out! 
wrapped really late last night.. and up really early.. and thats not cool...gotta cut a tough song today..and im sneezing..jeez...#TLCneeded 
Management in da house..... Troy Carter doin what he does best...  
thaaaaanx babe.... Good luck rockstar!!! 
don't burn honey!! 
 Familia in da house too and ... With goin nuts at the back...haha! 
 Genius songwriter duo Sam Watters and ! Let's make a SMASH baby! 
In the studio.. Makin BADASS music!! Super energy today!! Let's kill it people!! 
Packing packing... Craziness..off to LA tonight.. Making music is magic! Will miss home but looking forward to new adventures...Xoxo 
First day in studio....gosh..id forgotten how much fun this is!! so what do u guys think i should write my songs about..? any ideas? 
Hey guys... loved chatting with you all. Gotta go now... it's a beautiful sunday afternoon here... enjoy what's left of your day/ night ;-) 
thanks debjit... feels great to have u guys on my side 
thanks ;-) will tell her that 
sweet dreams razeen 
right back at ya! 
thanks Niro... what's up with u 
don't cry ;-) smile... its a beautiful day! 
hey Genelia 
hey Ankur 
thanks 
hahahahah. hey whats up 
hahahaha... hey Sunny 
:-) I do read your tweets 
thanks!! 
hahaha... i wish! was there recently for my bro's graduation ceremony 
hey sonia 
hey chandan 
awwww... so sweet thanks 
All the best for ur exams 
thanks Anand 
i like chatting with you guys... i never count my replies... :-) 
unfortunately no plans as of now... but you never know :-) 
Hey Sanam! 
yes... i try to reply as often as I can. 
thanks so much Amrit 
Thanks... 
Hi Ram ... Hey Calgary 
hiiiiii 
hi... right back at ya! 
Hahahaha. thanks... 
thank u sooooo much 
Hahahaha ... I wish I could but not this time!! 
hey Dhawal 
study hard and make ur parents feel proud!!! ;-) 
a big shout out to you and everyone else in Norway ;-) 
hey there 
hey what's up 
thanks 
thanks! 
of course i will... hey! whats up 
awww thanks 
thanks. fingers crossed 
Hi there 
Awww... you're the sweetest! Always have the nicest things to say. 
Thank u 
_ Haahahaha I wish 
says who ;-)?? Hey there! 
These perfrmncs were at "A Decade of Difference" concert 2 celebrate 10 years of the Clinton Foundation.Super fun..time to make some music 
What a fab way to begin my music time in LA... watching Bono, Lady Gaga, Usher, K'naan and more, performing LIVE... awesome & inspiring! 
in the lounge..aaah looking forward to sleeping on the plane..may God take care of my loved ones  
Packing packing... Craziness..off to LA tonight.. Making music is magic! Will miss home but looking forward to new adventures...Xoxo 
Passing out now guys..too much to do Tom before I fly..with stars in my eyes and my dreams surrounding me.. I'll float off to sleep...later! 
Welcome to my friend and producer of Don2..the friendly gunda..hehe.Ritesh sidhwani....@ritesh_sid..DrumRoll pls! 
it matters to me because I read them and love them.. 
agastya and navya naveli 
of course I know.. Ure my twitter rockstar 
here's wishing the original rock star a very happy bday.. Much love and respect sir..here's to many such wonderful days... 
good night world..got shoot early morning for barfee... excited!!..hoping my angels havent forgotten me.. c u in my dreams..... 
Just landed into Mumbai 2 the shocking news of Jagjit Singh's demise.What a loss for us all.He was an institution & will b sorely missed.RIP 
landed into the beautiful Chennai for the Nokia champions league finals today.Excited 2 meet the winner of the contest n watch a super match 
1.5 million. Wow. Thank you for all your love you guys. Trust me there are days only you get me thru. Muah. Xoxo 
thats last night at the peoples magazine best dressed launch. Me and manish malhotra. Great show. 
 
been a crazy few days. Looking forward to walking for manish malhotra for the people magazines best dressed issue. Should be super fun 
Madh island...haha... Me n my typos.... 
haha yes I meant Mach island... 
Beautiful sunset in mud island...  
On set with karans AD and@priyankaborkar1.. With the crowd watching.. Haha..  
On set shooting agneepath... My director karan malhotra and rekha chinni prakash..ace choreographer...awwww...  
That i have fans who support me thru all my good times and bad..my rockstars..that no matter what,If i have all this..i know I'll be alright 
I'm grateful that I come to work everyday..that my dads face lights up when he sees me..no matter how he's feeling..that ma stays up for me. 
I'm grateful that I have a functional body..tho the Mind may be in question(haha)..I'm grateful I have pple who love me all around me..... 
U know those days where u just feel like it'll all be good....today is one of those..I'm grateful..what r u guys grateful for? 
Thx for all those remedies..will try some..also will try shutting up a bit.. Off to meet to watch some parts of the film.yay.. 
 at just dance.. 
Down with a throat infection..so croaking away.. Need my voice back..gonna be in the studio soon..any quick fixes? 
Had a super hectic super fun day yesterday..shot for barfee,then went for the just dance finale and then the charge sheet premiere...phew... 
I looove the promos of the tv show that is doing.. I think shell make a killer host! Dying to watch..Way to go chica!! 
Heading to work.. Too far.. Too much traffic..too much cough..too sleepy..ufff..anything in moderation???? 
Toooo funny!I love it RT@FreddyAmazin I have learned that pleasing everyone is impossible, but pissing everyone off is easy and fun as hell. 
don't talk shit! Pls 
hate is a strong word lil man! 
thx sulaiman..it's a stunning name 
Decided! Amaira it is! Thanx guys...so wassup world? Gimme the goss! 
Does anyone know what amaira means 
same to u.... 
hey..long time.. All good with me... U doin ok? 
Oh before I leave.My BFF ridhima just had a baby girl..any name recommendations?Alphabets A,P or V.New cool unique names guys.Thx 4 the help 
Ok guys reached my destination.. Catch y'all at another traffic jam.. Love and be loved.... 
notbreally 
became an actor 
only if u really propose 
too many 
wud love to..something like Oprah 
it's a sequel!! Duh!! 
hey 
nope! 
pralines n creme 
thx 
engineering 
def Gaga 
rnb 
their smiles 
in LA 
don2 agneepath 
omen 
long list 
my kisses don't come so easy 
definitely more than u 
when I find the guy of my dreams 
always loved it 
Tupac...respect always!! 
when he asks me to... 
rajma chawal 
my mac book pro and iPad 
haven't seen it yet.. But heard great things 
I'll definitely not change! 
huuuuuge shoutout to Toronto!! 
in my car..location..secret..hehe.. 
not anytime soon unfortunately... 
Stuck in an endless traffic jam...yeesh..QnA??? Been a while.. Shoot guys.. Fast!!!!! 
Thanx..I love this pic RT@bombaychopra guys, i just put new pic of on fb, do see it.she looks like twin. 
 on set.. Anurag sirs AD sangeeta..my asst zeesha..production..@shubhshivdasani ..and my hairstylist 
So loving..kind..and just simple..all the need is love and patience..i truly believe special children are closest to God... 
So..Shooting barfee today..had 2 shoot with some autistic kids as I'm autistic in the film..I can't even begin 2 tell u how special they r. 
Me tooooooo!! RT plz i dont wanna die so early i m still single. 
Scaaaaaary....RT Second giant chunk of space junk heading for Earth  
was in Delhi for the GIMA awards. Went really well. Met all my family after so long. Nothing like the love of your own. Will miss you. 
heard about Nawab Pataudis tragic demise. Such an incredible man. Its a loss for the nation. My condolences and strength to his family. 
Who wants to watch the finals of Nokia CLT20 with me in Chennai? Here's your chance..log on to  - Will be loads of fun! 
Hey guys.. Wanna give a shoutout to my friend and journo par excellence Omar Qureshi... ..let's show some twitter love... 
honey thats What twitter is for. To tweet about yourself. Haha maybe you should try it. 
shooting a killer song for don 2. Too much fun. Have a crazy few days ahead too. aaah the life. Wassup world? 
happy bday my twitter rockstars!! 
thats too funny!! 
Phew...finished!!! and i didnt fall!! yaaaaaay!!!now some zzzzzs.. super early mornin tom.. eeeesh 
Gonna walk for Neeta Lulla for Blenders Pride fashion tour.so scared of walkin the ramp.. takin tips from my model friends.wish me luck!!! 
...and... the Blenders Pride Fashion tour FB fan page has crossed over 1,00,000 fans today! how cool is that!!! 
Here's a double whammy from Kolkatta - Catch me LIVE at the Blenders Pride Fashion Tour in Kolkata - just log on to  .. 
No u dont.. u never do.. thank u for always loving me.. 
U know the only thing u can do for me is..Pass those exams.. I never give up.. u wont either..love ur letter..big hug.thank u 
My condolences to the families of the victims..May God give u courage... 
my heart goes out to our capital.first the blast then the earthquake.what is the need for such violence.it angers me so much.. 
hey guys...really sorry but I'm stuck in a terrible jam and am running late... the live chat is still on but now at 6:30... chat soon! 
On my way to the LIVE chat...looking forward to it...hope to catch U guys there. Join me on my coffee date on & at 5:30 
time to call it a night.... after a tough day..let the darkness cradle u in its arms to sleep.. gn world... 
overworked, underslept and an unwavering spirit. It is What it is! 
thank you dubai for being a wonderful audience. After a Great show, a 4o clock morning flight ,just landed and heading to shoot agneepath. 
hate flights at this unearthly hour! But should land early too so good. Off to dubai for a show. Exhausted and need sleeeeeep!yaaawn! 
baarish.. My favorite reason. Something so romantic in the air.. So tangible.  
oh hi samipriya 
but before i go.. i went down memory lane.. 17 yr old me.. recognise? 
ok...slleeeepy time now.. gotta steal some zzzzzzzzs.. early morning shoot for Nokia.. for the champions league.. shud be fun.. love yall 
hey to u too.. ur sis threatening me!! hahahaha! 
thank u priyankachopra.org for the amazing dvd,nur,marianne n everyone else.u make me cry every year.n BTW d tshirt fit perfectly.love yall 
sorry i missed tweeting to u disha 
thank u so much. i love ur sketch 
so nice to come back to our ganpati bappa. Small but handsome. :)  
finally the day is done.Feels fruitful. Looking forward to going home. Jumping into my parents bed and Sleepin on my moms tummy. Airport now 
hanging with the girls was so inspiring.  
talking to the parents to convince them to send the girls to school  
my ganpati gift by the girls 
 
the adolescent girls i met at a sabla institute run by the govt of India. I went on behalf of unicef. Such fun.  
ganpati bappa morya. Happy ganesh chaturthi everyone. May all our dreams come true. 
uff too early to fly..Hardly slept like an hour. Met wonderful friends at s Eid party. Now back to work. Hey Jaipur here i come.. :) 
off to Jaipur tomorrow on behalf of unicef..Will post pictures..Early morning flight and Eid celebrations tonight. yippy. 
Eid Mubarak world... a day of peace and celebration. Have a wonderful Eid while i go and munch on biryani and sheer korma. Yum. 
i read ur letter.. ure to kind to love me so much.. i hope i deserve it..pls get good grades in ur boards..study hard..for me 
So excited to showcase the first look of the film RT@ TeamPriyanka The cast and crew of #AgneepathMovie at the launch! twitpic.com/6d04fy 
So excited for you'll to see this... RT Here it is boys and girls... the Agneepath trailer... bit.ly/nbHwWu 
hey world. Been a while. Back in mumbai.me shooting an ad for nikon today with .Life is at a super fast pace. Im loving it. 
chillin like a villain..long day at work and now just vegetation... yeah.. best state of being.. afrojack in da house!! 
Hi prerna. How are you? 
The kurekshtra of the war against corruption shifts to Ramlila Maidan! God and India is with YOU, Anna! 
This is a complete shock.. there is a song... 
"only the good die young" by Billy Joel
.. U will always be remembered.. 
RIP Samir Chanda.Had the good fortune of knowing the incredible man he was in Kaminey and Saat khoon maaf.Thank u for always believing in me 
hehe thx.. (embarassed smile..)! 
Listening to 80s retro!What an era for music.'never gonna give u up..never gonna let u down..never gonna turn around and desert u.'who sang? 
My friend album drops today called"Hit the lights India Tour edition".. out in stores now.. If u like music.. this one is it! 
Fab stuff I'm hearing about the Blenders Pride Fashion Tours. Check out their FB page..  & tell me what you think! 
wht fun we had! RT@TeamPriyanka caught up with for dinner when he was in town over the weekend. twitpic.com/66xboo 
shooting barfee full on now..in kolkatta.. love this city.. have great memories here..gonna OD on fish curry n roshogulas .. yum 
nothing will ever fill the void u have left . im sorry i didnt try RESSEE.. but wil do.. only for u.. R.I.P 
sometimes no amount of kind words can compensate for a loss! bhole baba ki jai shammi maharajji.. he was our guruji..im at a loss.. 
Finally on my way home! Mixed feelings...phew. Glad for the end of a big schedule and now nervous about starting Burfee tomorrow! Yikes! 
Chilly day today.. But I feel like sunshine..wonder what adventures are in store today..smiling for no reason..strange eh? 
Boredom struck!! Got purple streaks... Say whaaaaaaaa?
  
hey shreya.. 
 partner in crime for the day.. ..girls day out..lunch..shopping..movie..yeeeeesh..so girly... Haha!! 
Happy bday 
 gonna get outta bed and stop being lazy...maybe go look around town! I have a day off after an eternity.. 
Contemplating what to do? Any suggestions? 
babe u ok? 
thanks so much shreya..I'm excited! 
I have to thank all u guys for ur good wishes for my music foray..I'll need all ur support and ideas..so keep em comin..loooove xoxo 
up early on a day off..still in bed..feelin lazy,content,not wantin this feeling to end..N then d phone rings..breakin my reverie n I smile. 
thank u for ur letter and album!! good luck with trinity 
dont ever say that..even as a joke.. ure beautiful the way u r!! 
 friend in the house!! Yaaay! Has come visiting for the day..what's da plan tonight ? 
thanx Radha..... 
i have the best crew in the world!!! 
thaaaaanx punnnu!!ooops! punit!!haahaha 
love u truuuuun!!!yaaay 
thank u .. muah 
thanku ALI..was awesome meeting u yest! 
thanx sooo much 
yaaay nanu!!!!! 
thanx soooooooo much!! 
big shout out to who kickstarted this entire music foray 
thaaaanx guys 
thanx babe..... 
thanx so much babe...@realpreityzinta ... muuuah! 
happy happy bday to the adorable .. may u have a super year!! 
Wanna wish one of my favorite actors of all time a very happy bday.. A huge shoutout to the one n only KAJOL.. big fan!!! 
thanx babe....muaaaaah!! 
thank you atul!! 
Thank you ... U have always believed in me and it means so much having your support..love n respect always 
Its that time of the day where i sit back and think of all that God has given me.. and just say thank u..I know hell always watch out for me 
awwwww u guys!!! 
thanxxxx ritz!!! 
thaaaaaax farhan...Yup! finally doing what u said! 
thanx kunal!! 
thanx Ro!!!! 
arre sir.. sorrry sorry sorry.. soo many tweets.. my bigggggest mistake.. pls forgive.. pls! 
THANK YOU AND a BIG HUG to all of u for ur good wishes..ill need u all to be the wind beneath my wings..as u have always been with my movies 
ITS FINALLY OFFICIAL 
thaaaanx J 
thank you so much! 
thaaaanx Ash! 
thanx so much bose!!!! 
thanx bhaaaaiyya 
thaaaanx vishal 
Music has always been a passion and now I have been given the opportunity to share it with the world. Wish me luck... 
I've already started working on the album.It's scary but so very exciting & I'm counting on UR support as I begin this exciting new journey 
A long cherished dream is now taking flight and I am so very excited! 
I've signed a global recording deal with Universal Music Group (UMG)&Desi Hits!The album will be in English & will have a worldwide release. 
OMG OMG...it's finally happened.Big day for me guys... goin nuts!!Just signed a recording deal to release my debut International music album 
ok guys.. rain has stopped.. finally some shoot.. yaaaay! off to work!! have a good day.. love xoxox 
no waaaaay.... just when my trips to LA r gonna be frequent....u will be missed radha!! but congrats n good luck! 
been a fab shoot so far..was in london yest shooting for MAXIM with the awesome who had to fly to spain..2 hrs n we were dun! 
hey guys..i know i know ive been absconding!! my baaaaaaaad!!but im back!On a rainy nottingham day..doing hair n make up..listenin to bruno! 
hello twitterworld.. night shooting in UK for s film... by a river and me in shorts!!freeezin my a#$ off..literally!! hahaha! 
hey guys..so im in UK!In a beautiful quaint town shooting s film..i needed a sort of routine after my jetsetting..so me is happy 
Hi aparna 
hey there. and hello malaysia. 
hey there 
No way... no bunking. go straight to class... now :-) 
hey imran 
hi gayatri 
Hey Vicknesh and hello singapore 
wow 18.... have a great birthday! 
nope... trying to reply to as many as possible. 
hey deepak 
hi yash 
hi nada 
hahaha...good idea... but i don't believe in violence 
life is hectic... but good :-) how are u 
hi Kamal 
wishing you in advance. Have a great birthday :-) 
happy birthday hitesh 
:-) :-) :-) :-) :-) 
nice... i love poetry 
hahahaha...that's one way to look at it 
happy birthday 
Hi shweta 
Will defi give feedback once I see it 
Hi Kinjal 
i do read your tweets. It was unfortunate we could not meet in LA. 
hello!! 
Not yet ankita 
Happy birthday :-) 
hi there 
hello there 
thanks for your wishes 
Of course i have. Hi there 
yup... they are reaching me. Hi there 
- hi Sana. How are you? 
hi there 
I don't appreciate being used to create unwarranted controversy with baseless information... unacceptable! 
...Ours is a love story... where is the connect? What say 
...What a fertile imagination!!! There was no verification made with anyone before they made this resounding conclusion.... 
Woke up this morning to an amazing piece of fiction... a news story that says my role in Kunal's film is similar to that of 'Heroine'... 
Hi there! 
awwww.... thank you! 
Awwww... thanks Manish Sir 
Thank you sir 
Thanks Ashwini. Big hug 
:-) thanks Punit 
Thank you guys for making my birthday so special. Love and big hugs 
Thank you guys. Love you all 
:-) thank uuuuuu 
Thanks you anu for the wishes and kind words 
Thank you guys so much. It's lovely 
Will try to respond to as many as I can but I am definitely reading each & every message.U'll really know how to make a girl feel special! 
I am completely & totally overwhelmed. Thank you all for making my birthday so special with all the wonderful messages & wishes. So touched 
back in Mumbai. Loving the rains. On my way to set to shoot for Raone. Should be super fun. 
hearing awesome things about ZNMD..good luck to ZOYA, , , Ritesh sidhwani, abhay deol, kalki and katrina..cant wait 
DON2 TRAILER ...  .. SAY WHAAAA? 
lemme know what yall think of the trailer......... 
heading home..LAs been amazing..but looking forward to seeing my family..my dad n my brother esp with everything thats happenin wanna b home 
heres a huge bday shoutout to my guuuurrrlll ...LOVE U LOADS GIRLIE.. 
i wish i was back in my city to share this grief.. MUMBAI MERI JAAN..!!!!! 
why do we have to always accept this terrorism..why r we always told to move on.. I WONT STAND FOR TERROR ANYMORE..and i WILL NOT FORGET! 
why do we have to always accept this terrorism..why r we always told to move on.. I WONT STAND FOR TERROR ANYMORE..and i WILL NOT FORGET! 
im so saddened by whats happened in mumbai.. my heart wrenches at the though of what the families of the victims r going thru..its so wrong. 
Understand the message before you abuse the messenger! Typical 
Terrible news about the blasts. A request - please do not cause panic by tweeting/ spreading rumors / unconfirmed news. 
Police Control Room for help #Mumbai 22621855 22621983, 22625020, 22641449, 22620111 etx 100" #mumbaiblasts 
Thanks you guys!!! RT - in the list of Top 20 popular celebs who R active in cyber world.  
Feedback :) RT Check out the latest Filmfare with & Imran Khan looking so cute & adorable.  
Can't wait for u'll 2 see it RT Great news.The first promo of Don 2 releases tomorrow.Watch this space for more.It's a smasher 
took these pics last mth at his graduation..y? 
 at graduation dinner.... wot fun!! how soon we both have grown up.. 
 me wearing my brothers medal at his graduation... proud me!! 
 baby bro n me at his school in switzerland.. 
an ipad2... 
Heres wishing my baby brother siddharth a super happy bday.. love u chigster!! !the best baby bro evaaaaah..hit him up guys! 
i love music.makes me feel like a child..im filled with gleeeee!the thump of the beat..the ease of the melody..the feeling each note evokes! 
up early..sleep late..spending days doing things made of dreams..sometimes..the beauty of life passes us by..cause we just dont stop to look 
RIP Bibi.. heres a prayer for her and courage her family...from all of us on Don 2.. 
its shocking how unpredictable life can be. Bibi.My stunt double from Don 2 passed away.Taught me all i did in the film.  
been awesome in LA so far.. back home in a few days.. i wonder what mumbai will have in store.. almost been disconnected from the world.. 
u can block me if u want.. but chill babe.. u can write what u want.. much love..xoxo 
dont burn darlin... 
mommys day out..happy 4th of july here yall..LA was the place to be last night!! 
 
i love drunk pple..at the hotel..overheard a really funny conversation of this girl in the lift..is 1 a better floor or 10..waaa??hahahahah! 
jealous? 
that's sooo cute.. Congrats... 
too cute hehe no cd ya.. Just a rubbish rumor..but I hope to soon..love music.. 
Hey guys..so I looooves happy bday month.. My mom bought me the awesomest gifts today.. I looooves surprise gifts..teeeheeeheee 
hello world.. tell me the best things to have happened to u.. simple pleasures..mine being..loud music..smiles of pple who love me.. 
And thank you for the gifts... I'm definitely gonna use that diary a lot!! 
another great thing about being in Toronto was that I got to meet 2 of my Twitter rockstars & Great seeing U guys. 
I also wish that journo's would actually do some journalism rather than scriptwriting and stop deciding my next moves!!! 
contd... it'll be amazing to work together again but GUYS this one aint it!!! I wish him and Aishwarya lots of luck with the film. 
read some stupid article about how i wanna do s film HEROINE..i think madhur is an amazing director and... cont. 
had an awesome time at IIFA toronto.. thank u so much u guys for all ur love...now back to the LA summer....mommy in town. yay!! 
i am in LA 
ILL NEVER SAY THAT!! get some sleep 
awww. i remember that pic.. san francisco rite? 
as soon as ure done bein it!!! hehe!! 
boooo hooooo 
FOR REAL?? thats my most spoken phrase 
heheheheeheh bhaiya.... miss u here in LA.. COME SEE ME!! 
deciding still.. gown, saree.. ghagra?? cant make up my mind 
i am performing.. doing a tribute to Asha Bhosle.. some of her coolest songs!! 
by indian love i mean people who love indian movies!! all over the world... and that in cludes u 
THANK U.. i looove to sing!! 
come on prashant!! after my shout out u r!! official twitter PC rockstar status 
i land at 530 in the mornin.. waaaaaaaa!!! 
say whaaaaa?? 
i only like EATING my meat.. definately not wearing it!! haha 
definately looking forward to the fans!! 
so what shud i be looking forward to u guys?? 
heading to toronto tonight.. IIFA here i come..should be fun.. been away from all the indian love for a while...looking forward.. 
today i ate awesome mexican food... but u know what... taco bell is still better!!! haha! childhood memories! 
sooooo tired today.. feel like im seeing stars without even reaching IIFA... shud be there by 25th in toronto.. for now.. need some zzzzzzzs 
Hey world..was reading poetry..anyone read Pablo Neruda?how about some urban poets? Recommendations? 
HMM so seriously,how many pple tweeted on ur behalf?sojust cause i like ur profile pic,heres a HUGE BELATED BDAY SHOUTOUT2 
LA weather is awesomeness... prepping for IIFA too.. have a killer act up my sleeve..hehe..looking forward to meeting lots of u there.. 
CONGRATS SIR and ..awesome news!! lets make way for the legacy to go forward...... 
loving what I do... don;t want a break just yet :-) 
hey there. I'm having a blast in LA. A big shout out to everyone in Sri Lanka 
right back at ya! 
hey there 
awwwww that's so sweet. Thanks 
looking forward to being at IIFA 
hey there 
thanks so much 
hey, what's up? 
happy birthday 
nope. Am still away! 
a big birthday shout out to one of my twitter rockstars - have a great one... xoxo 
LA bound..i love long flights..get time to introspect..n get quality'me' time..something i dunno what to do with yet..but hoping to discover 
..behind the camera who make it look so easy for us actors.. Yup! That means were still shooting.. Lol... Will go on till 6 I think..yawwwn. 
 .behind the camera is so busy..and in front looks so effortless..thank u too all the amazing people 
 PC at 330 in the morning.. The amazing mickey contractor,@priyankaborkar1, zeesha my asst and vardhan.. 
hmmmm interesting! Will do for sure! 
then hope to c u 
now show us also na yaaaa! 
Shooting an all nighter for ..my ma and brother coming to visit..Yay..for now..a hot stemming bowl of cheese maggi comin up!yay! 
Now my second shoot..an ad.. Then rehearsal for IIFA...hmmm ..sometimes I wonder if I work too much..haha but me looooves! 
happy 17th Dana! 
happy bday bob 
Happy birthday ..have a super year... 
Shooting for today....love the team.. And looking forward to a super cover.. 
hey guys! Miss u divs 
hi tam 
sometimes because we get over thousand tweets a min. Diff to reply all xoxo 
On my way to work,this bitter sweet morning with the pitter patter of the rain being the beat to the music in my head..been a crazy few days 
even pinks f**kin perfect. I love the song. And adele. Hmmm . Looks like A big dose of mushy is coming up! Haha. 
tell the devil i said hey when you get back to where Youre from. I love that line.  
sometimes its moments like this that make you realize no matter how much you spin around stillness is always in your hands..Have a good one 
my beats in my ears with bruno mars throwin his grenade. The rain pattering on my sunroof and my coffee in my hand  
Way to go team Filmfare RT We have hit the 1 lakh followers mark. Hugs aur bahut saara pyaar. Shukriyaa! 
i meant work by the way. Haha back to my typos. Haha have a good day tweasts! Which means twitter beasts btw. Muah. 
some of your names were seriously hilarious and some totally vulgar.Too funny.Ok i gotta go to York now.Shot ready.Chat soon.Xoxo luv yall 
ok mine r too cheesy so dont laugh pls.Ok so one is called ' pretty mushy soft' then 'touched' then'power music'for when i wanna feel strong 
Haha says hara din for green day. Cheesy but cute. 
thx thats so sweet. Hers is called evergreen sunshine with all my songs. Xoxo 
funny. said rainbow biryani. Haha thats too funny. said so ja beta. Haha. Hilarious 
tell me some of your funny playlist names. Then ill tell you mine. Mine are so silly that Im embarrassed to say first. Hehe. 
melody gardots baby Im a fool.Another fav..think ill make a new playlist and call it'tender hearted music'.Do you guys have mood playlists? 
sitting in hair and makeup while listenin to chasing cars by snow patrol.One of my all time fav songs.I think Im in a mushy mood today.Hehe. 
thaki haari ghar ko chali. . But a Great day at work. is awesome to work with.  
thank you too ankita 
Thanks guys. Much love 
happy birthday 
You have to start somewhere. And this is a good start. Hopefully one day soon we will cover all the villages that have no light 
Over Rs. 11.6 crores covering 580 Villages & lighting up lives of 145090 people... thanks everyone for making the NDTV Greenathon so huge! 
wow. My days R getting longer and the nights shorter.Off to work. Exciting song shoot for kunal kohlis film.But exhausted to the core.Yeesh. 
OMG... 11.2 crores that will light up 560 villages. Thank you all for making the NDTV Greenathon such a success! 
we're in the home strech. Thanks for ur support. We've touched 7.38 crores and 369 villages  
we're moving swiftly towards the 300 mark and helping us gt there and beyond is the wonderful -thank you f  
the support is pouring in. Thanks for coming out to support the NDTV Greenathon.  
ooops. I meant crossed. Also forgive the delays. . . Twitter is acting up 
I'm so excited because we've just cropped a huge milestone-5 crores & 250 Villages. Thank you so much for the support! 
Gooood morning world. Its world environment day and i'm at the NDTV Greenathon. Great start already.  
after a quick trip to Switzerland comin 2 da NDTV greenathon to join soon.Hope he has been holdin up.Dunno about me tho!Phew 
also that kadi saddi galli bhul ke bhi aaya karo is awesome.what other hindi tracks do u guys like..dk bose? 
we dont have a final title for the film yet guys hence i cant tell you. :( listening to character dheela on the radio. Killer song! 
sometimes i wonder What it would have been like to live in another era. Thank god Im an actor. I get to be whatever i want to be. 
hey guys. Whats up in the world. Ive just started my new film with shahid for kunal kohli. Fifth day and is so much fun. On my way to work. 
I miss writing them :-) 
all the best! 
Ditto "Miss Malini"... RT MissMalini So awsum talking 2 u yest super sweet & sound so much like my girlfriends.... 
All the very best Amrit! 
awwww how sweet is that 
thank you soo much 
so tired. Feeling a little blah. Gonna get an awesome mommy hug and it Will be good i think. What say? 
 
so Im at the amazing Eden gardens in kol where the Mumbai Indians are playing Kkr. Cracker of a game. Such funn! 
So its official... I'm going to be performing at IIFA this year! I'm so looking forward to being back in Toronto! 
wot new music do u guys recommend.? 
all the best 
heading to south ex 1 in Delhi at the geetanjali store. Should be fun. Then have to be at kingdom of dreams. Long day. 
Will try and post some more pictures of my visit to the Manawas village in Rajasthan. It was quite an eye opener! Much to do still 
Learning exprience RT@vikramchandra: Moment of truth! figures out how to milk the buffalo!! :-)  
finally landed into Delhi. Tired muddy dirty but happy.dying to have a shower. And eat some food. Looking forward to my hotel bed. 
so i gotta say my adventure has been fun so far. Catch us at 930. NDTV. 
..and i milked a buffalo. Yikes! Its hard dude. What if i hurt her. I was only scared of that. And i sat on a camel cart for a bumpy ride. 
so i cooked a roti on a chulha in a hut and ate it with aloo sabzi that was made by the lady of the hut. And was my dinner yummy or what. 
its 45 degrees man! Killer. 
just reached the village. This village hasnt had electricity for 60 years. And now because of the greenathon they have solar lanterns. 
cant seem to upload pictures. :( 
so arrived into Jaipur. Driving to a village called manawas. What a difference, something we take so for granted, makes.light! 
at 9 30 tonight we Will be on NDTV live. So watch out. Ill also tweet pictures of the whole trip. Me and my team excited. 
so Im super excited to be heading to rural rajasthan with to check out the villages that were lit by the greenathon last year 
have a crazy day ahead today. Mumbai- Jaipur- meerut- Jaipur- Delhi- Mumbai. by tom night! Yikes! Let the wild times roll! 
wow! A million. Thank you so much you guys. I feel very loved today.my twitter rockstars r the best. Big smile and loads of love. Xoxo 
shot an ad in the day and now this song all night. Been up almost 24 hours. Still super energetic but major mood swings.2much coffee u think 
So shoots still on. Thank god for dancing.feels awesome.Tho missed a fun party at a friends place but guess d agneepath set is as much fun! 
feeling strangely alone today standing in the midst of a huge crowd on set. I dunno y. Does that happen to you guys? 
i love the latka jhatkas. Been too long since ive shot i full on desi song. masti! 
shooting all night for a super song for agneepath. saroj khan in the house! Too much fun! 
yay my kkr killing it. Lets show then some love guys. Yay! Smash it! 
knew we would win! Awesome! So worth the trip. 
killing it. I have a feeling tonight gonna be a good night. 
the kkr cheer leading squad  
yay lady luck seems to be working so far 
the boys. Kkr killin it! 
 
hey guys. In kolkata. On my to watch my team kkr play kings x1 Punjab with a few friends. Should be a killer night. Will keep you posted. 
happy birthday . May you have an awesome one. Love u always. 
hey guys. pls give a big shoutout to my friend .lets Show him some twitter love guys. 
after ajmer sharif and pushkarji heading back to Mumbai. and . Feelinfor.essed. Have so  
on my way to visit ajmer sharif with my friends.Have so much to be grateful for. 
hi 
Yes I am!! :-) RT - 
I am a certified technoholic: Priyanka Chopra  
Sorry about my abrupt departure from our chat session yesterday... apparently I had crossed my limit of tweets for the day!! Had super fun 
hiiiii 
Hey there Krupa 
hi there 
keep the faith... true love always finds a way 
How sweet.... thanks 
Here's one for you. hiiiiiiii 
Alll the best 
they do.... wassup DJ 
absolutely - hey there guys 
hiiiii 
Hey Maryam 
Nope. Got it. Would love to. It's my fav film 
hiya 
kar diya :-0 
never never will I forget where I came from 
That's a good enough tweet ;-) hiiiii 
All good. u? 
See ya later! 
NOT AT ALL :-) 
hey aveen 
hey aveen 
Hey there. 
all the best 
only for a week? :-) hi there 
I have many tweets to go through! Hi there 
hey there. How's it going 
hi there 
- i love his music! 
ALL THE VERY BEST 
it's not about luck... it's about patience ;-) 
hello hello hello hello hello - 5 replies from me ;-) 
and today's the day! hiiii 
Hello New Zealand and Aniket :-) 
no need to spam. A simple hello will do :-) hey there 
All the best! Make it count! 
hiiiiii 
hey 
hello 
hi 
That's a nice way to get attention ;-) hey there Srishti 
Rumi 
all good. What's up? 
not much! I try to reply to as many as i can! What's up? 
hey fayaz what's up 
thanks haneefa 
hahahah..oops. my mistake 
yes vikaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaasssssssssssssssss 
Hey there... from Mumbai 
Where there's a will... there's a way :-) 
hi there Arpita. How's it going? 
hiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiii Nithin 
A big smile :-) :-) just for you! 
the series ended! i had fun writing it! 
hey Niro - all well. how's things with you? 
will have my team look into it 
hi ajay 
happy happy birthday 
yes i am. what's up with you? 
hi there. on popular demand from all your friends 
hi hi hi :-) 
hey there 
hi there 
All of them!!!! 
hey hey hey :-) 
how sweet. 
Hi Sana 
hey there. How are you 
i try to do it as often as i can 
how sweet thanks 
hey there 
I would love to take a holiday there. Hopefully someday soon. 
happy happy birthday 
not ignoring. trying to reply to as many as possible 
hi there 
hey hey hey 
Go to Kromakay in Juhu and ask for kanta! 
Hey there 
thanks. 
hiiiiiiiiiii 
thanks 
thanks Sanchit 
Just went to buy some books and DVD's 
hey there 
will Soniya. would love to see Nepal 
thanks so much 
thanks soo much 
hi 
I try to when I get the time 
of course i did... 
Hey Sabrina. What's up 
Hey there 
it's good to take some time off once in a way. 
lucky you. It's burning hot in Mumbai 
thanks..you too! 
hey there 
hahaha. Nice! and thanks! 
just got busy... no other reason 
hi there 
Very funny Devansh! what you upto aside from Bollywood! 
thanks 
i just enjoyed them I suppose. All the best... for the tests :-) 
hey there 
hahahahaha. nice! thanks for the update 
hey there Vibhor. what's up? 
i do... and they do bring a smile to my face.. so thanks! 
Oh yummy. I want some also :-) 
plenty lined up.. Don 2, Agneepath, Barfee, Krish and kunal kohli's next with Shahid 
wow. study hard! all the best 
thanks guys... appreciate that 
hahahaha nice :-) 
hahahaha. thanks for the tip :-) 
right back at ya! 
Happy Happy birthday! 
wassup Pari 
Hi there! 
Yes I am. It's the Nokia E7 and its fab 
Hey there Sid 
Hey Amrit... the shoots going very well. what's up in your world 
Shooting for Agneepath is great fun 
busy busy busy :-) 
now that sounds interesting! lucky you! 
hi 
hey there! 
not bored... just busy! 
thanks so much 
71 has its charm!! Hi there. thanks for the many tweets 
Got an unexpected day off... just taking it easy... alone at home. What's everyone else upto? 
And.... I'm back! What's up with world? 
by the way i meant relevant. Haha. Sorry lol. Typos r my fav remember! 
now..for whats relavent..its a proud moment for a democracy that anna hazare has won.Its been proven again that unity can win over anything! 
here is wishing the amazing Jaya maam a very happy bday sir . Regards and love 
what say ? 
IM NOT PART OF dostana2. Jeez. So pls journalists,my request to u is,lets focus on news that is at least new if not actually relavent n true 
the question.this was cleared some 2 years ago.n whn it comes to a special appearance or something thats a much later call.once and for all 
some spice becomes their only way out. I was never doing dostana two..hello..reason bein my love story ends in the first film..so where is 
hey guys. Woke up with the funniest news today.i feel so bad for journalists who r so desperate for an article that rehashing old news with 
Humour is always welcome BUT in the right context. Don't demean the cause because you want to have some fun! 
Is this all a big joke to you? I'm not laughing. Why not put your energies to better use! 
hi 
hey there. 
Also what's remarkable is the uprising of the youth of our country in support of Anna Hazare. I pledge my support to this cause. 
Just read about Anna Hazare. It's incredible to see the support he has received from across the country... 
On the shoot for Agneepath. Days merge into nights... lost touch with the outside world. What's up twitterverse? What have I been missing 
cant post pix of hrithik or me on set guys as we r in our looks for the film. But ill stay in touch for sure 
Agnipath director karan malhotra and his amazing better half ekta at work. Action!  
Agnipath set. Chai banau? With maska pav. My fav.  
How many of you guys went out into the streets to celebrate? I did and it was simply Awesome!!!! Pride and joy was what I saw everywhere! 
Sealing our victory with that powerful sixer, MS Dhoni showed the world what he and the rest of Team India are capable of...being Champions 
Good afternoon India... Good afternoon World Champions... Still reeling from what the boys in blue pulled off last night! Magnificent!! 
welcome to the twitter family;-) 
Happy birthday. Have great one! 
Well played Pakistan. You guys are formidable opponents. Be proud of what you've achieved this world cup. 
Oh my god! What a show of class Team India! The world cup awaits you in Mumbai! Can you hear the unified sound of pure joy.. Indiiiiiiiaaaa 
We got your back boys.... A billion + prayers and wishes. Just do what you do best.... Make us proud! Jai Hind 
Go Indiiiiiiaaaaa. On the sets of Agneepath.... Shooting till late evening. Gonna be glued to the TV every chance I get!!! Full excitement! 
on set with and .a Smile among chaos is so nice. Burfi sets. Work work. But fun. 
 
day two on burfi sets.So wierd to start a new film.n esp such a tough character.I really wonder sometimes. Why do i do this to myself? ;) 
Now that's what I'm talking about Indiiiiiiiaaaaa. 
All the best 'Men in Blue'. Make us proud. We're all rooting for you! Go Indiiiiaaaa 
Day 1 of Barfee... nervous, stressed and excited. Wish me luck! 
facing the world  
so i finally did it. Jumped onto that treadmill. Threw away my fears! Haha. Now refreshed and taking on the world. burfi look test! Scary! 
..feelin lazy though. Have an hour before work. What say? 
so. Im thinking ill finally inaugurate my new treadmill that i bought two months back. It seems to have become my maids fav storage place. 
3... 
2 
1 
happy birthday. have a wonderful day and year! 
On a quick snack break... thought I'd say hi. We're boiling in Mumbai. What's up with the rest of you ?  
hey shweta 
On a quick snack break... thought I'd say hi. We're boiling in Mumbai. What's up with the rest of you ? 
how pretty is the architecture in south Mumbai. 
 
pic while i was in NYC. Miss the winter in this heat.  
hey guys.Started agneepath today.Crazy how scary the first day of a film is.Almost makes me feel like i have never faced the camera before. 
"Nvr be bullied into silence.Nor allow yourself 2 b made a victim.Accept no one's definition of ur life; define urself." - Harvey Fierstein 
wanna wish all the ladies out there a happy womans day. Celebrate urselves.cause u make d world go round.We r What luv was always meant 2 be 
so Im shooting for don 2 in Malaysia. AwesomeNess. Last three days of the film.. Makes me sad. It has been so amazing. Will miss everyone. 
in dubai rite now..transit...yeeesh..too long if u ask me.. 
awesome few days in NYC.. needed the break.. now back to work..sooo looking forward to goin to malaysia for don 2..my fav crew..look out...! 
Big hug from me! Sorry we couldn't meet! 
not if my family has anything to do with it :-( sorry! wont be back for a while! 
ok guys... gotta go.. family calls :-) 
that was a tough tweet to decipher :-) but hey there 
Thankssssssss 
What? I'm not in the hotel. Out with my family. We've just stopped for a coffee. Sorry you guys had to wait 
thanks so much 
Hey Dina. How's it going 
For sure! I love paris 
hey Bruna... I miss rio. had such a fab time there 
got them.. and now replied :-) 
Hey Harvinder 
hey thanks Nora 
thanks so much 
thanks Payal. You guys are very special to me. So try to reply as much as I can 
where? 
hey Nilima. 
Hey Iftu... yes I'm back :-) 
thanks 
hey there 
thaaanks so much 
it was great fun. she's really nice 
thaaaanks Tanvi. You're the sweetest! 
thanks... back to Don 2 shoot in a few days 
:-) what a great idea. Maybe the next time I'm here! 
hey there stephanie... what's up 
:-) thanks 
hey Sarthak...how's it goin? 
thankssss 
will try the next time I'm here! :-) 
not yet decided :-) :-) :-) :-) 
hello neha . What's up 
One year later and you're still studying????? hahahaha - keep it up! 
Hey... hi... helloo :-) 
All the best 
Namaste Poland! Great to hear from you! 
Thanks *blush* 
Thanks *blush* 
Happy belated birthday 
awww... thanks! 
thanks Dana 
hey there 
thanks Jasjeet! 
Hey there pari... what's up with you? 
hey hey Marianne... what's up? 
thanks so much 
thanks so much 
hey... it all starts from within. Accept who you are. That's half your battle won!! 
thanks Anisha 
the concert was faaaab 
hello hello 
Hey hey Rani.... how's it going. Thanks for the kind words... as always. 
Smile... don't cry sana :-) how you doin 
Hey Hajar... happy birthday and congratulations on the baby... xoxo PC 
Hey there... what's up??? 
hey there. Go to sleep :-) 
:-) :-) RT Priyanka's double role in Bazaar Only this talented Bollywoodgirl cld pull this off!  
crazy amazing few days... lovingggggg NYC 
i love the feel of NYC..reeminds me of school days when me n my cousins wud walk the streets and dream of conquering the city..owning it.. 
